CIK: 1145197
Company Name: INSULET CORP
Form Type : 10-K
Filing Date: 2018-02-22
Accession Number: 0001145197-18-000004


Item 1 Business Overview We are primarily engaged in the development, manufacturing and sale of our proprietary Omnipod Insulin Management System (the Omnipod System ), an innovative, discreet and easy to use continuous insulin delivery system for people with insulin dependent diabetes. The Omnipod System features a small, lightweight, self adhesive disposable tubeless Omnipod device, which is worn on the body for approximately 3 days at a time, and its wireless companion the handheld Personal Diabetes Manager ( PDM ). Conventional tubed insulin pumps require people with insulin dependent diabetes to learn to use, manage and wear a number of cumbersome comp1nts, including up to 42 inches of tubing. In contrast, the Omnipod System features only 2 discreet, easy to use devices that eliminate the need for a bulky pump and tubing, provides for virtually pain free automated cannula insertion, communicates wirelessly and integrates a blood glucose meter. We believe that the Omnipod System unique proprietary design and features allow people with insulin dependent diabetes to manage their diabetes with unprecedented freedom, comfort, convenience, and ease. We began commercial sale of the Omnipod System in the United States in 2005. We sell the Omnipod System in the United States through direct sales to customers or through our distribution partners. The Omnipod System is currently available in multiple countries in Europe, as well as in Canada and Israel. In January 2018, the Centers for Medicare & Medicaid Services ( CMS ) issued guidance clarifying that Medicare Part D Plan Sponsors may provide coverage for products such as the Omnipod System under the Medicare Part D (prescription drug) program. We believe this guidance will allow many additional people with diabetes to begin accessing our product in the future. Securing Medicare Part D coverage also provides us with a direct pathway to gain Medicaid coverage at the state level, as many state run Medicaid programs follow CMS prescription drug guidance to determine coverage. This allows access for lower income individuals and families on Medicaid for whom Omnipod is currently not an option. The Company estimates that obtaining Medicare and Medicaid coverage extends access to Insulet's Omnipod System to approximately 450,000 additional individuals with Type 1 diabetes in the United States. We announced in 2017 our plans to assume, on July 1, 2018, all commercial activities (including, among other things, distribution, sales, marketing, training and support) of our Omnipod System across Europe following the expiration of our distribution agreement with Ypsomed Distribution AG ("Ypsomed" or our "European distributor") on June 30, 2018. In addition to the diabetes market space, we have partnered with pharmaceutical and biotechnology companies that utilize a customized form of the Omnipod System to deliver a drug over a specified interval of time, at a certain administered volume. The majority of our drug delivery revenue currently consists of sales of Amgen's Neulasta Onpro kit. We are constructing a highly automated manufacturing facility in Acton, Massachusetts, with planned production out of the facility beginning in early 2019. The facility will also serve as our global headquarters. We expect that the new facility will allow us to lower our manufacturing costs, increase supply redundancy, add capacity closer to our largest customer base and support growth. In January 2018, we submitted a premarket notification 510(k) to the U.S. Food and Drug Administration ("FDA") requesting clearance for commercial distribution of our DASH TM System, which is our next generation of the Omnipod System, featuring a secured Bluetooth Low Energy enabled Pod and PDM with a touch screen color user interface supported by smartph1 connectivity. Upon clearance, we would begin a limited commercial release of the product prior to a full market launch. 3 Table of Contents Our Market Diabetes is a chronic, life threatening disease for which there is no known cure. Diabetes is caused by the body inability to produce or effectively utilize the horm1 insulin. This inability prevents the body from adequately regulating blood glucose levels. Glucose, the primary source of energy for cells, must be maintained at certain concentrations in the blood in order to permit optimal cell function and health. In people with diabetes, blood glucose levels fluctuate between very high levels, a condition known as hyperglycemia, and very low levels, a condition called hypoglycemia. Hyperglycemia can lead to serious short term complications, such as confusion, vomiting, dehydration and loss of consciousness and long term complications, such as blindness, kidney disease, nervous system disease, occlusive vascular diseases, stroke and cardiovascular disease, or death. Hypoglycemia can lead to confusion, loss of consciousness or death. Diabetes is typically classified as either Type 1 or Type 2 Type 1 diabetes is characterized by the body nearly complete inability to produce insulin. It is frequently diagnosed during childhood or adolescence. Individuals with Type 1 diabetes require daily insulin therapy to survive, typically administered via injections or continuous infusion through pump therapy. It is estimated that approximately 15 million people have Type 1 diabetes in the United States. Type 2 diabetes, the more common form of diabetes, is characterized by the body inability to either properly utilize insulin or produce enough insulin. Historically, Type 2 diabetes has occurred in later adulthood, but its incidence is increasing among the younger population, due primarily to increasing childhood obesity. Initially, many people with Type 2 diabetes attempt to manage their diabetes with improvements in diet, exercise and or oral medications. As their diabetes advances, some patients progress to multiple drug therapies, which often include insulin therapy. It is estimated that approximately 17 million people in the United States have Type 2 diabetes requiring daily insulin administration. Throughout this Annual Report on Form 10 K, we refer to both Type 1 diabetes and insulin requiring Type 2 diabetes as insulin dependent diabetes. Diabetes Management Challenges Diabetes is often frustrating and difficult for patients to manage. Blood glucose levels can be affected by the carbohydrate and fat content of meals, exercise, stress, illness or impending illness, hormonal releases, variability in insulin absorption and changes in the effects of insulin on the body. For people with insulin dependent diabetes, many corrections, consisting of the administration of additional insulin or ingestion of additional carbohydrates, are needed throughout the day in order to maintain blood glucose levels within normal ranges. Achieving this result can be very difficult without multiple daily injections of insulin or the use of continuous subcutaneous insulin infusion ( CSII ), often referred to as pump therapy. Patients attempting to control their blood glucose levels tightly to prevent the long term complications associated with fluctuations in blood glucose levels are at greater risk for overcorrection and the resultant hypoglycemia. As a result, many patients have difficulty managing their diabetes optimally. Additionally, the time spent in managing diabetes, the swings in blood glucose levels and the fear of hypoglycemia can render diabetes management overwhelming to patients and their families. Current Insulin Therapy People with insulin dependent diabetes need a continuous supply of insulin, known as basal insulin, to provide for background metabolic needs. In addition to basal insulin, people with insulin dependent diabetes require supplemental insulin, known as bolus insulin, to compensate for carbohydrates ingested during meals or snacks or for a high blood glucose level. There are 2 primary types of insulin therapy practiced today multiple daily injection ( MDI ) therapy using syringes or insulin pens; and pump therapy using insulin pumps. Insulin pumps are used to perform continuous subcutaneous insulin infusion, or insulin pump therapy, and typically use a programmable device and an infusion set to administer insulin into the person body. 4 Table of Contents MDI therapy involves the administration of a rapid acting insulin before meals (bolus) to bring blood glucose levels down into the healthy range. MDI therapy may also require a separate injection of a long acting (basal) insulin, to control glucose levels between meals; this type of insulin is typically taken once or twice per day. By comparison, insulin pump therapy uses only rapid acting insulin to fulfill both mealtime (bolus) and background (basal) requirements. Insulin pump therapy allows a person to customize their bolus and basal insulin doses to meet their insulin needs throughout the day, and is intended to more closely resemble the physiologic function of a healthy pancreas. Insulin pump therapy has been shown to provide people with insulin dependent diabetes with numerous advantages relative to MDI therapy. For example, insulin pump therapy eliminates individual insulin injections, delivers insulin more accurately and precisely than injections, often improves HbA1c (a common measure of blood glucose levels) over time, provides greater flexibility with meals, exercise and daily schedules, and can reduce severe low blood glucose levels. We estimate that approximately 1 third of the Type 1 diabetes population in the United States use insulin pump therapy. In addition, we believe less than 10% of the Type 2 diabetes population in the United States who are insulin dependent use insulin pump therapy. We believe that the distinct advantages and increased awareness of insulin pump therapy as compared to other available insulin therapies will continue to generate demand for insulin pump devices. In addition to the diabetes market space, we have partnered with pharmaceutical and biotechnology companies that utilize a customized form of the Omnipod System to deliver specific drugs over a specified interval of time, at a certain administered volume. The Omnipod System The Omnipod Insulin Management System is an innovative continuous insulin delivery system that provides all the proven benefits of insulin pump therapy in a way no conventional insulin pump can. The Omnipod System's innovative design and differentiated features allows people with insulin dependent diabetes to live their lives, and manage their diabetes, with unprecedented freedom, comfort, convenience and ease. The long term health benefits of better blood glucose control are well known. Maintaining near normal blood glucose levels can help people with insulin dependent diabetes live a longer, healthier life with fewer diabetes related complications. The Omnipod System also has many practical, everyday benefits, including convenience, freedom, flexibility and ease of use. Continuous insulin delivery at preset rates eliminates the need for individual injections and the interruptions that come with them. In addition, with the Omnipod System, insulin delivery can be changed with the press of a button to adapt to snacks or unexpected changes in daily routine. The Omnipod System works much like the pancreas of a person without diabetes by delivering insulin in 2 ways 5 Table of Contents A small, constant background supply of insulin (basal) is delivered automatically at a programmed rate, all day and night. An extra dose of insulin (bolus) can be delivered when a patient needs it to match the carbohydrates in a meal or snacks or to correct high blood glucose. The Omnipod System is a discreet 2 part design, the Omnipod device ( Omnipod or Pod ) and the PDM, that eliminates the need for the external tubing required with conventional pumps. The Pod is a small, lightweight, self adhesive device that the user fills with insulin and wears directly on the body. The Pod delivers precise, personalized doses of insulin into the body through a small flexible tube (called a cannula), based on instructions that the patient programs into the Pod's wireless companion, the PDM. The PDM is a wireless, handheld device that programs the Pod with the user's personalized insulin delivery instructions, wirelessly monitors the Pod's operation and includes a FreeStyle blood glucose meter. We have designed the Omnipod System to fit within the normal daily routines of patients. The Omnipod System consists of just 2 devices, as opposed to up to seven for conventional tubed insulin pumps. As a result, the Omnipod System is easy for patients to use, which also reduces the training burden on healthcare professionals and users. We believe that the Omnipod System overall ease of use makes it very attractive to people with insulin dependent diabetes. We also believe that the Omnipod System ease of use and substantially lower training burden helps to redefine which diabetes patients are appropriate for insulin pump therapy, allowing healthcare professionals to prescribe pump therapy to a broader pool of patients. The Omnipod System unique patented design and proprietary manufacturing process allow us to provide CSII therapy at a relatively low up front investment compared to conventional tubed insulin pumps. We believe that our pricing model reduces the risk of investing in pump therapy for third party payors and makes this therapy much more accessible for people with insulin dependent diabetes. In 2017, the results of a clinical study were published in a peer reviewed, scientific journal demonstrating that insulin infusion devices similar to the Omnipod System can effectively maintain the blood glucose levels at a basal level across a representative sample of individuals, including children and adolescents, with Type 1 diabetes. This study further demonstrates the effectiveness of the Omnipod System and builds on the catalog of clinical evidence that helps us build support for our product within the physician community. In 2016, there were 3 publications in peer reviewed, scientific journals demonstrating the clinical and quality of life benefits associated with use of the Omnipod System. 2 publications reported results of a retrospective study of patients with Type 1 and Type 2 diabetes. The study demonstrated clinically meaningful and statistically significant improvements in HbA1c (an important measure of blood glucose control), reduction in total daily dose of insulin and reduction in the frequency and severity of self reported hypoglycemic episodes after 3 months of Omnipod System use compared to previous treatment with either multiple daily injections or traditional tubed insulin pumps. The third publication reported results of a second study that surveyed current adult Omnipod System users of which the majority reported positive changes in quality of life including perceived control over their diabetes, reduced diabetes distress, improved overall well being and sense of hypoglycemic safety since initiating treatment with the Omnipod System. In addition, the majority of patients also reported significant improvement in glycemic control with more than 1 third reporting a decrease in severe hypoglycemic episodes. 6 Table of Contents Competition The medical device industry is intensely competitive, subject to rapid change and significantly affected by new product introductions and other market activities of industry participants. The Omnipod System competes for patients in the insulin delivery industry. As the majority of new Omnipod System end users have previously used MDI therapy, which is currently the most prevalent method of insulin delivery, we believe that we primarily compete with companies that provide MDI products such as insulin syringes and needles. Also, we compete with companies in the insulin pump therapy market, which consist of conventional tubed pump companies and patch pump companies. Conventional tubed pump companies include Medtronic MiniMed, a division of Medtronic Public Limited Company ("Medtronic"), and Tandem Inc. Medtronic has historically held the majority share of the conventional tubed insulin pump market in the United States. The competitive landscape in our industry is undergoing significant change. For example, during 2017, Animas Corporation, a division of Johnson & Johnson, announced that it is exiting the insulin pump market in the United States and other countries. In addition to the established insulin pump competitors, several companies are working to develop and market new insulin patch pumps and other methods of insulin delivery, such as nasal, for the treatment of diabetes. These companies are at various stages of development and the number of such companies often changes as they enter or exit the market. Our non insulin drug delivery product line also competes with drug delivery device companies such as West Pharmaceutical Services, Inc. Several of our competitors are large, well capitalized companies with significantly more market share and resources than we have. They are able to spend aggressively on product development, marketing, sales and other product initiatives. Some of these competitors have significantly greater name recognition; established relations with healthcare professionals, customers and third party payors; larger and more established sales forces and distribution ne2rks; greater experience in conducting research and development, manufacturing, clinical trials, marketing and obtaining regulatory approval for products; and greater financial and human resources for product development, sales and marketing and patent litigation. Research and Development Our current research and development efforts are primarily focused on the development of mobile applications for the Omnipod System, including Omnipod DASH Insulin Management System . We are developing our next generation of the Omnipod System, which features a secure Bluetooth Low Energy enabled Pod and PDM with a touch screen color user interface supported by smartph1 connectivity. We refer to this as our Omnipod DASH System, or ( DASH ). In January 2018, we submitted a premarket notification 510(k) application to the FDA requesting permission for commercial distribution of DASH. Concentrated Insulin Delivery . In collaboration with Eli Lilly, we are developing new products that leverage the DASH mobile platform to support the use of concentrated insulins for Type 1 and Type 2 patients with higher insulin requirements, utilizing the same form factor as our existing Pod. These new products are being specifically designed to deliver Humalog 200 units mL and Humulin R U 500 insulin, which are concentrated forms of insulin used by people with highly insulin resistant Type 2 diabetes. We believe these innovations should significantly expand our access to more of the Type 2 diabetes market. Omnipod Horizon Automated Glucose Control . We are also developing a hybrid closed loop control system that would utilize the DASH mobile platform. Our Pod will communicate with Dexcom Inc.'s ("Dexcom") continuous glucose monitor and help control insulin delivery utilizing an algorithm located on the Pod. 7 Table of Contents In addition to insulin delivery, we continue to work with pharmaceutical and biotechnology companies on alternative uses for our Omnipod System technology as a delivery platform for a range of different pharmaceuticals and therapies. Manufacturing and Quality Assurance We believe a key contributing factor to the overall attractiveness of the Omnipod System is the disposable Omnipod continuous insulin delivery device. In order to manufacture sufficient volumes and achieve a cost effective per unit production price for the Omnipod, we have designed the Omnipod to be manufactured through our current semi automated process. We are currently producing our devices on varying degrees of semi automated manufacturing lines at a facility in China, operated by a subsidiary of Flex Ltd. ( Flex ). We purchase our devices pursuant to an agreement with Flex. The current term of the agreement expires in September 2021 and is subject to an automatic renewal thereafter, unless otherwise canceled by the parties under the contract terms. The contract may be terminated by either party upon compliance with certain advance written notice provisions that are intended to provide the parties with sufficient time to make alternative arrangements. To lower our manufacturing costs, increase supply redundancy, add capacity closer to our largest customer base, and support our growth, we continue to invest in our supply chain operations. As part of our investment strategy, in 2016 we announced our plan to establish a highly automated manufacturing operation in the United States, and we expect to begin production through this operation in early 2019. To date, we have invested approximately $70 million in property, equipment and infrastructure related to the new facility. We utilize outside vendors for the supply of comp1nts, sub assemblies, and various services used in the manufacture of the Omnipod System. Our outside vendors produce the comp1nts to our specifications and they are audited periodically by our Quality Assurance Department to ensure conformity with the specifications, policies and procedures for the Omnipod System. Our Quality Assurance Department also inspects and tests the Omnipod System at various steps in the manufacturing cycle to facilitate compliance with our specifications. We have received approval of our Quality Management System from the BSI Group London, U.K., an accredited Notified Body for CE Marking and the International Standards Organization ( ISO ). Processes utilized in the manufacture, test and release of the Omnipod System have been verified and validated as required by the FDA and other regulatory bodies. As a medical device manufacturer and distributor, our manufacturing facilities and the facilities of our suppliers are subject to periodic inspection by the FDA and certain corresponding state agencies. Intellectual Property To maintain a competitive advantage, we believe we must develop and preserve the proprietary aspect of our technologies. We rely on a combination of copyright, patent, trademark, trade secret and other intellectual property laws, non disclosure agreements and other measures to protect our proprietary rights. Currently, we require our employees, consultants and advisers to execute non disclosure agreements in connection with their employment, consulting or advisory relationships with us, where appropriate. We also require our employees, consultants and advisers who we expect to work on our current or future products to agree to disclose and assign to us all inventions conceived during their work with us that are developed using our property or which relate to our business. Despite any measures taken to protect our intellectual property, unauthorized parties may attempt to copy aspects of the Omnipod System or to obtain and use information that we regard as proprietary. Patents. As of December 31, 2017 , we had 16 granted and active United States patents with expiration dates ranging from 2020 through 2034, and had 53 additional pending United States patent applications. We believe it will take up to four years, and possibly longer, for the most recent of these U.S. patent applications to result in issued patents. We are also seeking patent protection for our proprietary technology in other countries and regions throughout the world. The issued patents and pending patent applications cover, among other things the basic architecture of the Omnipod System, including the pump and the PDM; the Omnipod shape memory alloy drive system; the Omnipod System cannula insertion system; 8 Table of Contents communication features between system comp1nts for the Omnipod System and next generation products; software for controlling the Omnipod System and next generation products; and various novel aspects of the Omnipod System, potential future generations of Omnipod Systems, and other mechanisms for the delivery of pharmaceuticals. Trademarks. We have registered various trademarks associated with our business with the United States Patent and Trademark Office on the Principal Register and in other appropriate jurisdictions. Our trademarks include OMNIPOD (R) , DASH TM , OMNIPOD U 200 TM , OMNIPOD U 500 TM , and HORIZON TM . Markets and Distribution Methods We sell our Omnipod System directly to patients or indirectly through intermediaries, such as independent distributors and the pharmacy channel, in the United States, Canada, Europe, and Israel. In 2017, direct sales to patients represented approximately 52% of our total revenue in the United States. We sell the Omnipod System in certain countries in Europe through our independent distributor. Our exclusive European distribution agreement expires on June 30, 2018, at which time we plan to assume all commercial activities (including, among other things, distribution, sales, marketing, training and support) of our Omnipod System across Europe. Comprehensive approach across 3 interrelated constituencies. Our sales and marketing effort for the Omnipod System is focused on patient retention and growing patient, clinician and payor demand for the Omnipod System. We have a uniform sales and marketing approach, aligned across patients, physicians and providers, to capitalize on the unique benefits of our Omnipod System technology. We have 3 areas of focus First, build patient awareness about the features and benefits that the Omnipod System provides. Second, build physician support by increasing the clinical evidence that clearly demonstrates the benefits that the Omnipod System provides and by improving the data available to physicians to monitor their patient's diabetes care. Third, provide payors with the clinical and economic justification of why the Omnipod System is a greater benefit for the patients whom they insure. Training. We believe that patient training is critical to ensure successful outcomes and patient retention on the Omnipod System. We have streamlined our new patient training by developing improved online resources, a standardized approach as well as increasing our field clinician team to directly train new Omnipod System customers. Customer Support. We seek to provide our customers with high quality customer support, from product ordering to insurance investigation, order fulfillment and ongoing support. We have integrated our customer support systems with our sales, reimbursement and billing processes and also offer support by teleph1 and through our website to provide customers with seamless and reliable customer support. Government Regulation Domestic Regulation. The Omnipod System is a medical device subject to extensive and ongoing regulation by the FDA and other federal, state, and local regulatory bodies. FDA regulations govern, among other things, product design and development, pre clinical and clinical testing, manufacturing, labeling, post market adverse event reporting, post market surveillance, complaint handling, repair or recall of products, product storage, record keeping, pre market clearance or approval, advertising and promotion, and sales and distribution. 9 Table of Contents FDA Pre Market Notification 510(k) and Pre Market Approval Requirements. Unless an exemption applies, each medical device we seek to commercially distribute in the United States will require either prior 510(k) clearance or pre market approval ( PMA ) from the FDA. The FDA classifies medical devices into 1 of 3 classes. Devices deemed to pose low to moderate risk are placed in either class I or II, which, absent an exemption, requires the manufacturer to submit to the FDA a premarket notification requesting clearance for commercial distribution. Some low risk devices are exempt from this requirement. Devices deemed by the FDA to pose the greatest risk, such as life sustaining, life supporting or implantable devices, or devices deemed not substantially equivalent to a previously cleared 510(k) device, are placed in class III, requiring approval of a PMA application. We have obtained 510(k) clearance for the Omnipod System and expect that PMA approval will be needed for some of our future products. We may be required to obtain a new 510(k) clearance or pre market approval for significant post market modifications to the Omnipod System. Both the 510(k) clearance and PMA processes can be expensive and lengthy and entail significant user fees, unless an exemption is available. 510(k) Clearance . To obtain 510(k) clearance for any of our potential future devices (or for certain modifications to devices that have previously received 510(k) clearance), we must submit a pre market notification demonstrating that the proposed device is substantially equivalent to a previously cleared 510(k) device or a pre amendment device that was in commercial distribution before May 28, 1976 for which the FDA has not yet called for the submission of a PMA application. The FDA 510(k) clearance pathway generally takes from 3 to twelve months from the date the application is completed, but can take significantly longer. After a medical device receives 510(k) clearance, any modification that could significantly affect its safety or effectiveness, or that would constitute a significant change in its intended use, requires a new 510(k) clearance or, depending on the modification, could require a PMA application. The FDA requires each manufacturer to make this determination initially, but the FDA can review any such decision and can disagree with a manufacturer determination. If the FDA disagrees with a manufacturer determination regarding whether a new premarket submission is required for the modification of an existing device, the FDA can, at its discretion, require the manufacturer to cease marketing and or recall the modified device until 510(k) clearance or approval of a PMA application is obtained. In addition, in these circumstances, we may be subject to significant regulatory fines or penalties for failure to submit the requisite PMA application(s). PMA. Devices deemed by the FDA to pose the greatest risk, such as life sustaining, life supporting or implantable devices, devices deemed not substantially equivalent to a previously cleared 510(k) device or devices in commercial distribution before May 28, 1976 for which PMAs have not been required, generally require a PMA before they can be commercially distributed. A PMA application must be supported by extensive data, including technical information, pre clinical and clinical trials, manufacturing and labeling to demonstrate the safety and effectiveness of the device to the FDA satisfaction. After a PMA application is complete, the FDA begins an in depth review of the submitted information, which generally takes between 1 and 3 years, but may take significantly longer. During this review period, the FDA may request additional information or clarification of information already provided. Also during the review period, an advisory panel of experts from outside the FDA may be convened to review and evaluate the application and provide recommendations to the FDA as to the approvability of the device. In addition, the FDA will conduct a pre approval inspection of the manufacturing facility to ensure compliance with Quality System Regulations, or QSRs, which impose elaborate design development, testing, control, documentation and other quality assurance procedures in the design and manufacturing process. The FDA may approve a PMA application with post approval conditions intended to ensure the safety and effectiveness of the device including, among other things, restrictions on labeling, promotion, sale and distribution and collection of long term follow up data from patients in the clinical study that supported approval. Failure to comply with the conditions of approval can result in materially adverse enforcement action, including the loss or withdrawal of the approval. After any pre market approval, a new pre market approval application or application supplement may be required in the event of modifications to the device, its labeling, intended use or indication or its manufacturing process. PMA supplements often require submission of the same type of information as a PMA application, except that the supplement is limited to information needed to support any changes from the device covered by the original PMA application, and may not require as extensive clinical data or the convening of an advisory panel. 10 Table of Contents Clinical Trials. Clinical trials are almost always required to support a PMA application and sometimes also 510(k) submissions. If the device presents a significant risk to human health as defined by the FDA, the FDA requires the device sponsor to submit an investigational device exemption ("IDE") to the FDA and obtain IDE approval prior to commencing the human clinical trials. The IDE must be supported by appropriate data, such as animal and laboratory testing results, showing that it is safe to test the device in humans and that the testing protocol is scientifically sound. The IDE must be approved in advance by the FDA for a specified number of patients, unless the product is deemed a non significant risk device, in which case an IDE approval from the FDA would not be required, although the clinical trial would need to meet other requirements including IRB approval. Clinical trials for a significant risk device may begin once an IDE is approved by the FDA and the appropriate Institutional Review Board ("IRB") at each clinical trial site. Future clinical trials may require that we obtain an IDE from the FDA prior to commencing any such clinical trial and that the trial be conducted with the oversight of an IRB at the clinical trial site. Our clinical trials must be conducted in accordance with FDA regulations and federal and state regulations concerning human subject protection, including informed consent and healthcare privacy. A clinical trial may be suspended by the FDA or at a specific site by the relevant IRB at any time for various reasons, including a belief that the risks to the trial participants outweigh the benefits of participation in the clinical trial. Even if a clinical trial is completed, the results of our clinical testing may not demonstrate the safety and efficacy of the device, or may be equivocal or otherwise not be sufficient for us to obtain approval of our product. Ongoing Regulation by FDA. Even after a device is placed on the market, regardless of its classification or premarket pathway, numerous regulatory requirements apply. These include, but are not limited to establishment registration and device listing; quality system regulation, or QSR, which requires manufacturers, including third party manufacturers, to follow stringent design, testing, control, documentation and other quality assurance procedures during all aspects of the manufacturing process; labeling regulations and FDA prohibitions against the promotion of products for uncleared, unapproved or off label uses, and other requirements related to promotional activities; medical device reporting regulations, which require that manufacturers report to the FDA if their device may have caused or contributed to a death or serious injury or malfuncti1d in a way that would likely cause or contribute to a death or serious injury if the malfunction were to recur; corrections and removals reporting regulations, which require that manufacturers report to the FDA field corrections and product recalls or removals if undertaken to reduce a risk to health posed by the device or to remedy a violation of the Federal Food, Drug and Cosmetic Act that may present a risk to health. In addition, FDA may order a mandatory recall if there is a reasonable probability that the device would cause serious adverse health consequences or death; and post market surveillance regulations, which apply when necessary to protect the public health or to provide additional safety and effectiveness data for the device. Failure to comply with applicable regulatory requirements can result in enforcement actions by the FDA and other regulatory agencies, which may include any of the following sanctions untitled letters or warning letters, fines, injunctions, consent decrees, civil or criminal penalties, recall or seizure of our current or future products, operating restrictions, partial suspension or total shutdown of production, refusal of or delay in granting 510(k) clearance or PMA approval of new products or modified products, rescinding previously granted 510(k) clearances or withdrawing previously granted PMA approvals, or refusal to grant import or export approval of our products. 11 Table of Contents We are subject to announced and unannounced inspections by the FDA, and these inspections may include the manufacturing facilities of our subcontractors. If, as a result of these inspections, the FDA determines that our equipment, facilities, laboratories or processes do not comply with applicable FDA regulations and conditions of product approval, the FDA may seek civil, criminal or administrative sanctions and or remedies against us, including the suspension of our manufacturing operations. Since approval of the Omnipod System, we have been subject to FDA inspections of our facility on multiple occasions. We cannot assure you that our facilities or our contract manufacturer or comp1nt suppliers facilities would pass any future quality system inspection. International Regulation. International sales of medical devices are subject to foreign government regulations, which may vary substantially from country to country. The time required to obtain approval by a foreign country may be longer or shorter than that required for FDA clearance or approval, and the requirements may differ. There is a trend towards harmonization of quality system standards among the European Union, United States, Canada and various other industrialized countries. The primary regulatory body in Europe is that of the European Union, which includes most of the major countries in Europe. Other countries, such as Switzerland, have voluntarily adopted laws and regulations that mirror those of the European Union with respect to medical devices. The European Union has adopted numerous directives and standards regulating the design, manufacture, clinical trials, labeling and adverse event reporting for medical devices, including the Medical Device Directive ("MDD"). Devices that comply with the requirements of a relevant directive will be entitled to bear the CE conformity marking, indicating that the device conforms to the essential requirements of the applicable directives and, accordingly, can be commercially distributed throughout Europe. The method of assessing conformity varies depending on the class of the product, but normally involves a combination of self assessment by the manufacturer and a third party assessment by a Notified Body. This third party assessment may consist of an audit of the manufacturer quality system and specific testing of the manufacturer product. An assessment by a Notified Body of 1 country within the European Union is required in order for a manufacturer to commercially distribute the product throughout the European Union. Outside of the European Union, regulatory approval needs to be sought on a country by country basis in order for us to market our products. In April 2009, we obtained the right to affix the CE Mark to the original Omnipod System, and in August 2011, we obtained the right to affix the CE Mark for our updated Omnipod System. The CE Mark gives us authorization to distribute the Omnipod System throughout the European Union and in other countries that recognize the CE Mark. In September 2009, we received Health Canada approval to distribute the original Omnipod System throughout Canada, and in March 2013, we received Health Canada approval for our current Omnipod System. We have been distributing the Omnipod System in certain countries in Europe through our European distributor since 2010. Licensure. Several states require that durable medical equipment ( DME ) providers be licensed in order to sell products to patients in that state. Certain of these states require, among other things, that DME providers maintain an in state location. Although we believe we are in compliance with all applicable state regulations regarding licensure requirements, if we were found to be noncompliant, we could lose our licensure in that state, which could prohibit us from selling our current or future products directly to patients in that state. In addition, we are subject to certain state laws regarding professional licensure. We believe that our certified diabetes educators are in compliance with all such state laws. However, if our educators or we were to be found non compliant in a given state, we may need to modify our approach to providing education, clinical support and customer service. Federal Anti Kickback and Self Referral Laws. The Federal Anti Kickback Statute prohibits the knowing and willful offer, payment, solicitation or receipt of any form of remuneration in return for, or to induce the referral of an individual; furnishing or arranging for the furnishing of Item or services reimbursable under Medicare, Medicaid or other federal health care programs; or the purchase, lease, or order of, or the arrangement or recommendation of the purchasing, leasing, or ordering of, any item or service reimbursable under Medicare, Medicaid or other federal health care programs. 12 Table of Contents The Federal Anti Kickback Statute has been interpreted to apply to arrangements between drug and medical device manufacturers and suppliers on 1 hand and prescribers, patients, purchasers and formulary managers on the other. Liability under the statute may be established without a person or entity having actual knowledge of the statute or specific intent to violate it. In addition, claims resulting from a violation of the Federal Anti Kickback Statute constitute false or fraudulent claims for purposes of the Federal False Claims Act, which is addressed below. Although there are a number of statutory exemptions and regulatory safe harbors protecting certain common business practices from prosecution and administrative sanctions, the exemptions and safe harbors are drawn narrowly, and practices that involve remuneration that may be perceived as inducing the prescription, purchase, or recommendation of the Omnipod System may be subject to scrutiny under the law. For example, we provide the initial training to patients necessary for appropriate use of the Omnipod System either through our own diabetes educators or by contracting with outside diabetes educators that have completed a Certified Pod Trainer training course. We compensate outside diabetes educators for their services at contracted rates deemed to be consistent with the market. We have structured our arrangements with diabetes educators and other business practices to comply with statutory exemptions and regulatory safe harbors whenever possible, but our practices may be subject to scrutiny if they fail to strictly comply with the criteria in the exemption or regulatory safe harbor. Moreover, there are no safe harbors for many common practices such providing reimbursement assistance, coding and billing information or other patient assistance and product support programs. If any of our practices, arrangements or programs are found not to be in compliance with the Federal Anti Kickback Statute, we can be subject to criminal, civil and administrative penalties, including imprisonment, fines, damages, and exclusion from Medicare, Medicaid or other governmental programs, any of which could have an adverse effect on our business and results of operations. Federal law also includes a provision commonly known as the Stark Law, which prohibits a physician from referring Medicare or Medicaid patients to an entity for the furnishing of certain designated health services, including durable medical equipment, in which the physician has an ownership or investment interest or with which the physician has entered into a compensation arrangement. Violation of the Stark Law could result in denial of payment, disgorgement of reimbursements received for Item and services referred by a physician with a noncompliant arrangement, civil damages and penalties, and exclusion from Medicare, Medicaid or other governmental programs. Although there are a number of statutory and regulatory exceptions protecting certain common business practices implicating the Stark Law, and we have structured our arrangements with physicians and other providers to comply with these exceptions, these arrangements may not expressly meet the requirements for applicable exceptions from the law. Federal civil False Claims Act. The Federal civil False Claims Act imposes penalties against any person or entity who, among other things, knowingly presents, or causes to be presented, a false or fraudulent claim for payment of government funds or knowingly making, using or causing to be made or used a false record or statement material to a false or fraudulent claim. Actions under the False Claims Act may be brought by the Attorney General or as a qui tam action by a private individual in the name of the government. Violations of the False Claims Act are subject to the imposition of significant per claim penalties, 3 times the amount of damages that the federal government sustained and possible exclusion from participation in federal health care programs like Medicare and Medicaid. We believe that we are in compliance with the federal government laws and regulations concerning the filing of claims for reimbursement. However, many drug and medical device manufacturers have been investigated or subject to lawsuits by whistleblowers and have reached substantial financial settlements with the federal government under the False Claims Act for a variety of alleged improper marketing activities, including providing free product to customers with the expectation that the customers would bill federal programs for the product; or causing submission of false claims by providing inaccurate coding or billing information to actual or prospective purchasers, and our business practices could be subject to scrutiny and enforcement under the Federal False Claims Act. We also may be subject to other federal false claim laws, including federal criminal statutes that prohibit making a false statement to the federal government. 13 Table of Contents Civil M1tary Penalties Law. We are also subject to the Federal Civil M1tary Penalties Law, which prohibits, among other things, the offering or transferring of remuneration to a Medicare or Medicaid beneficiary that the person knows or should know is likely to influence the beneficiary selection of a particular supplier of Medicare or Medicaid payable Item or services. Noncompliance can result in significant civil m1y penalties for each wrongful act, assessment of 3 times the amount claimed for each item or service and exclusion from the federal healthcare programs. Federal Health Care Fraud Statutes. We are also subject to a federal health care fraud statute that, among other things, imposes criminal and civil liability for executing a scheme to defraud any health care benefit program including non governmental programs, and prohibits knowingly and willfully falsifying, concealing or covering up a material fact or making any materially false or fraudulent statement or representation, or making or using any false writing or document with knowledge that it contains a materially false or fraudulent statement in connection with the delivery of or payment for health care benefits, Item or services. State Fraud and Abuse Laws and Marketing Restrictions. Many states have also adopted anti kickback, anti referral laws, and false claims laws and regulations analogous to the Federal civil Anti Kickback Statute and Federal False Claims Act, and in some cases these state laws apply regardless of the payer, including private payors. We believe that we are in conformance with such laws. Moreover, several states have imposed requirements to disclose payments to health care providers, restrictions on marketing and other expenditures, and requirements to adopt a code of conduct or compliance program with specific elements. Nevertheless, a determination of liability under such laws could result in fines and penalties and restrictions on our ability to operate in these jurisdictions. Administrative Simplification of the Health Insurance Portability and Accountability Act of 1996. The Health Insurance Portability and Accountability Act of 1996 ( HIPAA ) mandated the adoption of standards for the exchange of electronic health information in an effort to encourage overall administrative simplification and enhance the effectiveness and efficiency of the healthcare industry. Ensuring privacy and security of patient information is 1 of the key factors driving the legislation. If we are found to be in violation of HIPAA, we could be subject to civil or criminal penalties. Patient Protection and Affordable Care Act . The Patient Protection and Affordable Care Act as amended by the Health Care and Education Reconciliation Act of 2010 ( ACA ) enacted significant changes to the provision of and payment for healthcare in the United States. Under the ACA and related laws and regulations, federal and state government initiatives are focused on limiting the growth of healthcare costs and implementing changes to healthcare delivery structures. These reforms are intended in part to put increased emphasis on the delivery to patients of more cost effective therapies and could adversely affect our business. Certain changes to the ACA in the 115th United States Congress and under the Trump Administration have occurred and additional changes remain possible. Such changes could adversely affect our business. While some uncertainty exists regarding the future aspects of the ACA, we expect that the ACA will continue to have a significant impact on the delivery of healthcare in the United States and on our business in the near term. Physician Payments Sunshine Act . The Physician Payments Sunshine Act, implemented as the Open Payments program, requires manufacturers of drugs and devices for which Medicare or Medicaid payment is available to track and report payments and other transfers of value provided to physicians and teaching hospitals, as well as ownership and investment interests held by physician and their immediate family members. Our failure to disclose reportable payments could subject us to penalties and materially adversely impact our business and financial results. Additionally, as these laws and regulations continue to evolve, we lack definitive guidance as to the application of certain key aspects of these laws and regulations as they relate to certain of our arrangements and programs, including those with providers with respect to patient training. We cannot predict the final form of these federal and state regulations or the effect that application of those interpretations will have on us. As a result, our provider and training arrangements may ultimately be found not to be in compliance with applicable federal law. Even if we are not found to have violated the law, responding to lawsuits, government investigations or enforcement actions, defending any claims raised, and paying any resulting settlement amounts would be expensive and time consuming, and could have a material adverse effect on our reputation and business operations. 14 Table of Contents Third Party Reimbursement In the United States, our products are generally reimbursed by third party payors, and we bill those payors for products provided to patients. Our fulfillment and reimbursement systems are fully integrated such that product is generally shipped only after confirmation of a physician valid statement of medical necessity and current health insurance information. We maintain an insurance benefits investigation department that works to simplify and expedite claims processing and to assist patients in obtaining third party reimbursement. We continue to work with third party payors in the United States to establish coverage and payment for the Omnipod System. Our coverage contracts with third party payors typically have a term of between 1 and 3 years and set coverage amounts during that term. Typically, coverage contracts automatically renew for specified incremental periods upon expiration, unless 1 of the parties terminates the contract. Common medical criteria for third party payors approving reimbursement for CSII therapy include a patient having elevated A1c levels, a history of recurring hypoglycemia, fluctuations in blood glucose levels prior to meals or upon waking or, severe glycemic variability. Third party payors may decline to reimburse for procedures, supplies or services determined not to be medically necessary or reasonable. In a limited number of cases, some third party payors have declined to reimburse us for a particular patient because such patient failed to meet its criteria, most often because the patient already received reimbursement for an insulin pump from that payor within the warranty period, which is generally four years, or because the patient did not meet their medical criteria for an insulin infusion device. Reimbursement may also be declined by insurers based upon language in the contract between the insurer and the insured group. An example of this is certain employer self insurance plans that may choose to decline coverage based on specific provisions within those individual plans. Historically, there had not been an established mechanism for Medicare or broad Medicaid coverage for the majority of the Omnipod System. However, in January 2018, the CMS issued guidance clarifying that Medicare Part D Plan Sponsors are permitted to provide coverage for products such as the Omnipod System under the Medicare Part D (prescription drug) program. We have begun discussions with Medicare Part D Plan Sponsors to be listed on their formularies, which will allow many additional people with diabetes to begin accessing our product. Medicare Part D Plan Sponsors will be submitting bids to the government in the Spring of 2018 that include their formularies for 2019 plans. The ability of Medicare Part D plans to cover the Omnipod System also provides us with a direct pathway to gain Medicaid coverage at the state level, as many state run Medicaid programs follow CMS prescription drug guidance to determine coverage. This allows access for lower income individuals and families on Medicaid for whom Omnipod is currently not an option. The Company estimates that obtaining Medicare and Medicaid coverage extends access to Insulet's Omnipod System to approximately 450,000 additional individuals with Type 1 diabetes in the United States. As part of our international distribution agreements, our distribution partners establish appropriate reimbursement contracts with third party payors in countries and provinces in which they distribute the Omnipod System prior to distributing the Omnipod System in each territory. In anticipation of our transition to direct distribution and commercial support of our product in Europe upon the expiration of our European distribution agreement in June 2018, we are working with local payors to establish coverage and a payment process for our Omnipod System. Employees As of December 31, 2017 , we had 857 full time employees. N1 of our employees are represented by a collective bargaining agreement, and we have never experienced any work stoppage. We believe that our employee relations are good. 15 Table of Contents Company Information Insulet Corporation is a Delaware corporation formed in 2000. Our principal offices are located at 600 Technology Park Drive, Suite 200, Billerica, Massachusetts 01821, and our teleph1 number is (978) 600 7000. Our website address is http www.insulet.com . We make available, free of charge, on or through our website, our annual reports on Form 10 K, quarterly reports on Form 10 Q, current reports on Form 8 K, proxy statements and any amendments to those reports filed or furnished pursuant to Section 13(a) or 15(d) of the Securities Exchange Act of 1934, as amended, as soon as reasonably practicable after such material is electronically filed with or furnished to the Securities and Exchange Commission. The information on our website is not part of this Annual Report on Form 10 K for the year ended December 31, 2017. Item 1A. Risk Factors This Annual Report on Form 10 K contains forward looking statements. Forward looking statements relate to future events or our future financial performance. We generally identify forward looking statements by terminology such as may, will, should, expects, plans, anticipates, could, intends, targets, projects, contemplates, believes, estimates, predicts, potential or continue or the negative of these terms or other similar words. These statements are only predictions. We have based these forward looking statements largely on our current expectations and projections about future events and financial trends that we believe may affect our business, results of operations and financial condition. The outcomes of the events described in these forward looking statements are subject to risks, uncertainties and other factors described in this Item 1A Risk Factors and elsewhere in this Annual Report on Form 10 K. Accordingly, you should not rely upon forward looking statements as predictions of future events. We cannot assure you that the events and circumstances reflected in the forward looking statements will be achieved or occur, and actual results could differ materially from those projected in the forward looking statements. The forward looking statements made in this Annual Report on Form 10 K relate only to events as of the date of this report. We undertake no obligation to update any forward looking statement to reflect events or circumstances after the date on which the statement is made or to reflect the occurrence of unanticipated events. Risks Relating to Our Business We have incurred significant operating losses since inception and cannot assure you that we will achieve profitability. Since our inception in 2000, we have incurred significant operating losses. We began commercial sales of the Omnipod System in 2005. For the year ended December 31, 2017 , our operating loss was $7.4 million . Our net losses for the years ended December 31, 2017 , 2016 and 2015 were $26.8 million , $28.9 million and $735 million , respectively. The extent of our future operating losses and the timing of profitability are uncertain, and we may never achieve or sustain profitability. As of December 31, 2017 , we had an accumulated deficit of $707.3 million . We may experience significant fluctuations in our quarterly results of operations. The fluctuations in our quarterly results of operations have resulted, and may continue to result, from numerous factors, including delays in shipping due to capacity constraints; practices of health insurance companies and other third party payors with respect to reimbursement for our current or future products; market acceptance of the Omnipod System; our ability to manufacture the Omnipod System efficiently; transitions in our distribution channel; timing of regulatory approvals and clearances; new product introductions; 16 Table of Contents competition; and timing of research and development expenditures. These factors, some of which are not within our control, may cause the price of our stock to fluctuate substantially. In particular, if our quarterly results of operations fail to meet or exceed the expectations of securities analysts or investors, our stock price could drop suddenly and significantly. We believe the quarterly comparisons of our financial results are not necessarily meaningful and should not be the only indication of our future performance. We currently rely on sales of the Omnipod System to generate most of our revenue. The failure of the Omnipod System to achieve and maintain significant market acceptance or any factors that negatively impact sales of this product will adversely affect our business, financial condition and results of operations. Our main product is the Omnipod System, which we introduced to the market in 2005. We expect to continue to derive a significant portion of our revenue from the sale of this product. Accordingly, our ability to generate revenue is highly reliant on our ability to market and sell the devices that comprise the Omnipod System. Our sales of the Omnipod System may be negatively impacted by many factors, including the failure of the Omnipod System to achieve and maintain wide acceptance among opinion leaders in the diabetes treatment community, insulin prescribing physicians, third party payors and people with insulin dependent diabetes; manufacturing problems or capacity constraints; actual or perceived quality problems; changes in reimbursement rates or policies relating to the Omnipod System by third party payors; claims that any portion of the Omnipod System infringes on patent rights or other intellectual property rights owned by other parties; adverse regulatory or legal actions relating to the Omnipod System; damage, destruction or loss of any of the facilities where our products are manufactured or stored or of the equipment therein or failure to successfully open or expand new facilities; conversion rate of patient referrals to actual sales of the Omnipod System; write offs of receivables from customers; attrition rates of customers who cease using the Omnipod System; competitive pricing and related factors; and results of clinical studies relating to the Omnipod System or our competitors products. If any of these events occurs, our ability to generate revenue could be significantly reduced. Our ability to achieve profitability from a current net loss level will depend on our ability to sustain or reduce the per unit cost of producing the Omnipod System by increasing customer orders, increasing manufacturing volume and productivity and reducing raw material and overhead costs per unit. Currently, the gross profit from the sale of the Omnipod System is not sufficient to cover our operating expenses. To achieve profitability, we need to, among other things, sustain or reduce the per unit cost of the Omnipod System. If we are unable to sustain or reduce raw material and manufacturing overhead costs through volume purchase discounts, negotiation of improved pricing and increased productivity and production capacity, our ability to achieve profitability will be severely constrained. Any increase in manufacturing volumes must be supported by an associated increase in customer orders. Each Omnipod System contains limited amounts of precious metals, the costs of which have fluctuated over the recent past. The occurrence of 1 or more factors that negatively impact the manufacturing or sales of the Omnipod System or increase our raw material costs may prevent us from achieving our desired increase in manufacturing volume, which would prevent us from attaining profitability. 17 Table of Contents Adverse changes in general economic conditions in the United States and globally could adversely affect us. We are subject to the risks arising from adverse changes in general economic market conditions. A U.S. or global recession, could negatively impact our current and prospective customers, adversely affect the financial ability of health insurers to pay claims, adversely impact our expenses and ability to obtain financing of our operations, cause delays or other problems with key suppliers and increase the risk of counterparty failures. Healthcare spending in the United States, Canada and Europe could be negatively affected in the event of a downturn in economic conditions. For example, U.S. patients who have lost their jobs or healthcare coverage may no longer be covered by an employer sponsored health insurance plan and patients reducing their overall spending may eliminate purchases requiring co payments. Since the sale of the Omnipod System to a new patient is generally dependent on the availability of third party reimbursement and normally requires the patient to make a significant co payment, an economic downturn on our potential customers could reduce the referrals generated by our sales force and thereby reduce our customer orders. Similarly, existing customers could cease purchasing the Omnipod System and return to MDI or other less costly therapies, which would cause our attrition rate to increase. Any decline in new customer orders or increase in our customer attrition rate would reduce our revenue, which in turn would make it more difficult to achieve our per unit cost savings goals, which we are attempting to attain in part through increases in our manufacturing volume. Healthcare reform laws could adversely affect our revenue and financial condition. During the past several years, the U.S. healthcare industry has been subject to an increase in governmental regulation at both the federal and state levels. Efforts to control healthcare costs, including limiting access to care, alternative delivery models and changes in the methods used to determine reimbursement scenarios and rates, are ongoing at the federal and state government levels. There are provisions of law that provide for the creation of a new public private Patient Centered Outcomes Research Institute tasked with identifying comparative effectiveness research priorities. For example, establishing a research project agenda and contracting with entities to conduct the research in accordance with the agenda. Research findings published by this institute are publicly disseminated. It is difficult at this time to determine whether a comparative effectiveness analysis impacting our business will be d1, and assuming 1 is, what impact that analysis will have on the Omnipod System or our future financial results. Sales of certain medical devices are subject to a 23% federal excise tax, subject to a suspension through 2019. We believe that the sales of our products are exempt from this excise tax. However, if it is subsequently determined that sales of 1 or more of our products are subject to this excise tax, these tax obligations could adversely affect our financial results. In addition, the Affordable Care Act and related healthcare reform laws, regulations and initiatives have significantly increased regulation of managed care plans and decreased reimbursement to Medicare managed care. Some of these initiatives purport to, among other things, require that health plan members have greater access to drugs not included on a plan formulary. Moreover, to alleviate budget shortfalls, states have reduced or frozen payments to Medicaid managed care plans. We cannot accurately predict the complete impact of these healthcare reform initiatives, but they could lead to a decreased demand for our products and other outcomes that could adversely impact our business and financial results. Certain changes to the ACA have occurred in the 115th United States Congress and under the Trump Administration. For example, the Tax Cuts and Jobs Act enacted on December 22, 2017, eliminated the shared responsibility payment for individuals who fail to maintain minimum essential coverage under section 5000A of the Internal Revenue Code of 1986, commonly referred to as the individual mandate, beginning in 2019. Additional changes to the ACA remain possible. We expect that the ACA, as currently enacted or as it may be amended in the future, and other healthcare reform measures that may be adopted in the future, could have an adverse effect on our industry generally and on our ability to maintain or increase sales of any of our products and achieve profitability. 18 Table of Contents We may need to raise additional funds in the future, and these funds may not be available on acceptable terms or at all. Our capital requirements will depend on many factors, including revenue generated by sales of our current products and any other future products that we may develop; costs associated with adding further manufacturing capacity; costs associated with expanding our sales and marketing efforts in the United States and internationally; expenses we incur in manufacturing and selling the Omnipod System; costs of developing new products or technologies and enhancements to the Omnipod System; the cost of obtaining and maintaining FDA approval or clearance of our current or future products; costs associated with any expansion; the cost of complying with regulatory requirements; costs associated with capital expenditures; costs associated with litigation; and the number and timing of any acquisitions or other strategic transactions. We believe that our current cash, cash equivalents and short term investments of $440.1 million , together with the cash to be generated from expected product sales, will be sufficient to meet our projected operating requirements through at least the end of 2018. We may in the future seek additional funds from public and private stock offerings, borrowings under credit lines or other sources. We may need to raise additional debt or equity financing to repay our outstanding Senior Convertible Notes. If we issue equity or debt securities to raise additional funds, our existing stockholders may experience dilution, and the new equity or debt securities may have rights, preferences and privileges senior to those of our existing stockholders. In addition, if we raise additional funds through collaboration, licensing or other similar arrangements, it may be necessary to relinquish valuable rights to our potential future products or proprietary technologies, or grant licenses on terms that are not favorable to us. Our ability to raise additional capital may be adversely impacted by current economic conditions, including the effects of any disruptions to the credit and financial markets in the United States and worldwide. As a result of these and other factors, we do not know whether additional capital will be available when needed, or that, if available, we will be able to obtain additional capital on terms favorable to us or our stockholders. If we are unable to raise additional capital due to these or other factors, we may need to further manage our operational expenses to reflect these external factors, including potentially curtailing our planned development activities. If we cannot raise additional funds in the future on acceptable terms, we may not be able to develop new products, execute our business plan, take advantage of future opportunities or respond to competitive pressures or unanticipated customer requirements. If any of these events occur, it could adversely affect our business, financial condition and results of operations. 19 Table of Contents We may not be able to generate sufficient cash to service our indebtedness represented by our Convertible Senior Notes. We may be forced to take other actions to satisfy our obligations under our indebtedness or we may experience a financial failure. As of December 31, 2017, we had outstanding principal amounts due of $7512 million on our Convertible Senior Notes, which mature between 2019 and 2024. Our ability to make scheduled payments or to refinance the Convertible Senior Notes or other debt obligations depends on our financial and operating performance, which is subject to prevailing economic and competitive conditions and to certain financial, business and other factors beyond our control. We cannot assure you that we will maintain a level of cash flows from operating activities sufficient to permit us to pay the principal, premium, if any, and interest on our indebtedness. If our cash flows and capital resources are insufficient to fund our debt service obligations, we may be forced to reduce or delay capital expenditures, sell assets or operations, seek additional capital or restructure or refinance our indebtedness, including the outstanding Convertible Senior Notes. We cannot assure you that we would be able to take any of these actions, that these actions would be successful and permit us to meet our scheduled debt service obligations or that these actions would be permitted under the terms of our future debt agreements. In the absence of sufficient operating results and resources, we could face substantial liquidity problems and might be required to dispose of material assets or operations to meet our debt service and other obligations. We may not be able to consummate those dispositions or obtain sufficient proceeds from those dispositions to meet our debt service and other obligations when due. We are dependent upon third party suppliers, making us vulnerable to supply problems and price fluctuations. We rely on a number of suppliers who manufacture the comp1nts for and perform assembly of the Omnipods and PDMs. In addition, a subsidiary of Flex in China performs assembly and supplies all finished Omnipod Systems. We do not have long term supply agreements with most of our suppliers, and, in many cases, we, or Flex on our behalf, make purchases on the basis of individual purchase orders. In some other cases, where we do have agreements in place, our agreements with suppliers can be terminated by either party upon short notice. Additionally, our suppliers may encounter problems during manufacturing for a variety of reasons, including failure to follow specific protocols and procedures, failure to comply with applicable regulations, equipment malfunction, comp1nt part supply constraints and environmental factors, any of which could delay or impede their ability to meet our demand. Our reliance on these third party suppliers also subjects us to other risks that could harm our business, including we are not a major customer of many of our suppliers, and these suppliers may therefore give other customers needs higher priority than ours; we may not be able to obtain an adequate supply in a timely manner or on commercially reasonable terms; our suppliers may make errors in manufacturing that could negatively affect the efficacy or safety of the Omnipod System or cause delays in shipment; we may have difficulty locating and qualifying alternative suppliers for our sole source supplies; switching comp1nts may require product redesign and submission to the FDA of a new 510(k); our suppliers manufacture products for a range of customers, and fluctuations in demand for the products these suppliers manufacture for others may affect their ability to deliver products to us in a timely manner; the occurrence of a fire, natural disaster or other catastrophe, impacting 1 or more of our suppliers, may affect their ability to deliver products to us in a timely manner; and our suppliers may encounter financial hardships unrelated to our demand, which could inhibit their ability to fulfill our orders and meet our requirements. We may not be able to quickly establish additional or alternative suppliers, particularly for our sole source suppliers, in part because of the FDA approval process and because of the custom nature of various parts we require. Any interruption or delay in obtaining products from our third party suppliers, or our inability to obtain products from alternate sources at acceptable prices in a timely manner, could impair our ability to meet the demand of our customers and cause them to cancel orders or switch to competing products. 20 Table of Contents Establishment of a competitive bid program by CMS for conventional insulin pumps could negatively affect our operating results. CMS has announced that it will establish a competitive bidding program nationwide for conventional insulin pumps effective January 1, 2019. Since the Omnipod System is currently coverable by Medicare Part D through the pharmacy channel and not as durable medical equipment or as a prosthetic device, we would not be directly affected by this program. However, should this program commence in 2019 on a nationwide basis as announced, it is expected that there would be a reduction in the amount reimbursed by CMS for conventional insulin pumps. This may negatively impact our ability to negotiate future pricing with private payors comparing the price of the Omnipod System to conventional insulin pumps. If we are required to pay sales tax on sales of certain products, our results of operations could be adversely affected. We believe that sales of most diabetes supplies are exempt from sales tax in most U.S. jurisdictions. However, if it is subsequently determined that sales of 1 or more of our products are subject to sales tax in such jurisdictions, our obligation to pay such sales taxes could materially adversely affect our financial results. Our financial condition or results of operations may be adversely affected by international business risks. We use an exclusive distributor of the Omnipod System under an agreement that is in place through June 2018 in multiple countries in Europe including France, Germany, the United Kingdom, the Netherlands, Switzerland, Austria, Italy, Norway, and Sweden. In addition to the Omnipod System, our European distributor also markets and sells a suite of other products for the treatment of diabetes and has introduced and sells its own branded conventional tubed insulin pump. Therefore, this distributor could have a greater financial incentive to sell its proprietary products rather than the Omnipod System through the contract expiration in June 2018. We also sell the Omnipod System in Canada. As a result of our international sales, we are exposed to fluctuations in product demand and sales productivity outside the United States, which may be partially attributed to foreign exchange rate changes, and have to manage the risks associated with market acceptance of the Omnipod System in foreign countries. Our efforts to introduce or expand our current or future products in foreign markets may not be successful, in which case we may have expended significant resources without realizing the expected benefit. Ultimately, the investment required for expansion into foreign markets could exceed the results of operations generated from this expansion. We do not have control over our European distributor's operational and financial condition, and we are subject to foreign regulatory and import or export requirements. In addition, in order to reduce our cost of goods sold and increase our production capacity, we increasingly rely on third party suppliers located outside the United States. For example, currently all of our Omnipod Systems are manufactured at a facility in China operated by Flex. As a result, our business is subject to risks associated with doing business internationally, including political instability and adverse economic conditions; trade protection measures, such as tariff increases, and import and export licensing and control requirements; potentially negative consequences from changes in tax laws; difficulty in staffing and managing widespread operations; difficulties associated with foreign legal systems including increased costs associated with enforcing contractual obligations in foreign jurisdictions; changes in foreign currency exchange rates; differing protection of intellectual property; unexpected changes in regulatory requirements; failure to fulfill foreign regulatory requirements on a timely basis or at all to market the Omnipod System or other future products; availability of, and changes in, reimbursement within prevailing foreign health care payment systems; 21 Table of Contents adapting to the differing laws and regulations, business and clinical practices, and patient preferences in foreign markets; difficulties in managing foreign relationships and operations, including any relationships that we establish with foreign partners, distributors or sales or marketing agents; and difficulty in collecting accounts receivable and longer collection periods. In addition, expansion into foreign markets imposes additional burdens on our executive and administrative personnel, research and sales departments and general management resources. Our future success will depend in large part on our ability to anticipate and effectively manage these and other risks associated with doing business outside of the United States. Any of these factors may have a material adverse effect on our production capacity and, consequently, our business, financial condition and results of operations. Our planned assumption on July 1, 2018 of the commercial activities, including, among other things, distribution, sales, marketing, training and support, of our Omnipod System in Europe following the expiration of our current third party global distribution agreement creates several business and operational risks related to the future sales of our Omnipod System in Europe. We announced on July 20, 2017 our plan to assume, on July 1, 2018, all commercial activities (including, among other things, distribution, sales, marketing, training and support) of our Omnipod System across Europe following the expiration of our distribution agreement with our European distributor on June 30, 2018. Until the expiration of the agreement, our current distribution agreement for our Omnipod products in Europe will remain in effect. While we do not expect this transition to materially affect our financial trends during the first half of 2018, there could be a negative effect on our sales during the transition period if our European distributor places more emphasis on selling its own proprietary products and other products, instead of ours, during this period, thereby reducing our sales. In addition, to retain current revenue streams after July 1, 2018, we will need to secure the existing customer installed base of Omnipod users in Europe, and there can be no assurance that we will succeed in doing so. More generally, if we are unable to effectively establish direct distribution and commercial support for the Omnipod System in Europe in a timely manner (which will include hiring employees in many of these jurisdictions), we may not be able to service the current Omnipod users in Europe and grow the business as we anticipate. We expect to incur increased operating expenses as we invest in these European operations, and it is possible that the ultimate economic benefits that we derive from these investments could be less than anticipated, or that such expected economic benefits could fail to materialize at all. Any of the foregoing risks could negatively affect our future revenues and, depending on severity, potentially cause a materially adverse effect on our business and results of operations. Failure to secure or retain adequate coverage or reimbursement for our products by third party payors could adversely affect our business, financial condition and results of operations. We expect that sales of the Omnipod System will be limited unless a substantial portion of the sales price of the Omnipod System is paid for by third party payors, including private insurance companies, health maintenance organizations, preferred provider organizations, federal and state government healthcare agencies and other managed care providers. We currently have contracts establishing reimbursement for the Omnipod System with national and regional third party payors that provide reimbursement for patients residing in all 50 states. While we anticipate entering into additional contracts with other third party payors, we cannot assure that we will be successful in doing so. In addition, these contracts can generally be terminated by the third party payor without cause. Also, healthcare market initiatives in the United States may lead third party payors to decline or reduce reimbursement for the Omnipod System. Moreover, compliance with administrative procedures or requirements of third party payors may result in delays in processing approvals by those payors for patients to obtain coverage for the use of the Omnipod System. In addition, coverage decisions and rates of reimbursement increasingly require clinical evidence showing an improvement in patient outcomes. Generating this clinical evidence requires substantial time and investment and there is no guarantee of a desired outcome. We are an approved Medicare supplier and, in January 2018, CMS issued guidance clarifying that Medicare Part D Plan Sponsors may provide coverage for products such as the Omnipod System under the Medicare Part D prescription drug program. As a result, we must negotiate with third party payors in order to provide our product through the pharmacy channel to users who are covered under Medicare Part D. Compliance with administrative procedures or requirements of these third party payors may result in delays in processing approvals by those payors 22 Table of Contents for patients to obtain Medicare Part D coverage for the use of the Omnipod System. Medicaid coverage decisions are made by the governing authorities in each state. As the Medicaid coverage process and stakeholders are unique to each state, the timeline to gain coverage in each state may vary. Finally, as we expand our sales and marketing efforts outside of the United States, we face additional risks associated with obtaining and maintaining reimbursement from foreign health care payment systems on a timely basis or at all. Failure to secure or retain adequate coverage or reimbursement for the Omnipod System by third party payors, including Medicare, could have a material adverse effect on our business, financial condition and results of operations. We face competition from numerous competitors, many of whom have far greater resources than we have, which may make it more difficult for us to achieve significant market penetration and which may allow them to develop additional products for the treatment of diabetes that compete with the Omnipod System. The medical device industry is intensely competitive, subject to rapid change and significantly affected by new product introductions and other market activities of industry participants. The Omnipod System competes with several existing insulin delivery devices as well as other methods for the treatment of diabetes. Medtronic MiniMed, a division of Medtronic, has been the market leader for many years and has the majority share of the conventional insulin pump market in the United States. Other suppliers in the United States include Tandem Diabetes Care, Inc. In addition to the Omnipod System, our European distributor markets and sells a suite of other products for the treatment of diabetes and also sells its own branded conventional tubed insulin pump. This distributor may have a greater financial incentive to sell its proprietary products rather than the Omnipod System. Many of our competitors are large, well capitalized companies with significantly more market share and resources than we have. As a consequence, they are able to spend more aggressively on product development, marketing, sales and other product initiatives than we can. Many of these competitors have significantly greater name recognition; different and more complete reimbursement profiles; established relations with healthcare professionals, customers and third party payors; larger and more established distribution ne2rks; greater experience in conducting research and development, manufacturing, clinical trials, marketing and obtaining regulatory approval; and greater financial and human resources for product development, sales and marketing and patent litigation. We also compete with MDI therapy, which is substantially less expensive than CSII therapy. MDI therapy has been made more effective by the introduction of long acting insulin analogs that can be used in combination with bolus devices. While we believe that CSII therapy, in general, and the Omnipod System, in particular, have significant competitive and clinical advantages over traditional MDI therapy, improvements in the effectiveness of MDI therapy may result in fewer people with insulin dependent diabetes converting from MDI therapy to CSII therapy than we expect and may result in negative price pressure. In addition to the established insulin pump competitors, several companies are working to develop and market new insulin patch pumps and other methods for the treatment of diabetes, such as inhaled insulin. These companies are at various stages of development and the number of such companies continuously change as they enter or exit the market on an ongoing basis. 23 Table of Contents Our current competitors or other companies may at any time develop additional products for the treatment of diabetes. For example, other diabetes focused companies, including Abbott Diabetes Care, Inc. ("Abbott"), Becton Dickinson and Company, Eli Lilly and Company, Novo Nordisk A S, and Takeda Pharmaceuticals Company Limited, are developing similar products. All of these competitors are large, well capitalized companies with significantly greater product development resources than we have. If an existing or future competitor develops a product that competes with or is superior to the Omnipod System, our revenue may decline. In addition, some of our competitors may compete by changing their pricing model or by lowering the price of their insulin delivery systems or ancillary supplies. If these competitors products were to gain acceptance by healthcare professionals, people with insulin dependent diabetes or third party payors, a downward pressure on prices could result. If prices were to fall, we may not improve our gross margins or sales growth sufficiently to achieve profitability. We rely on the proper function, availability and security of our information technology systems to operate our business and a cyber attack or other breach or disruption of these systems could have a material adverse effect on our business and results of operations. We rely on information technology systems to process, transmit and store electronic information in our day to day operations. The form and function of such systems may change over time as our business needs change. The nature of our business involves the receipt and storage of personal and financial information regarding our patients. We use our information technology systems to manage or support a variety of business processes and activities, including sales, shipping, billing, customer service, procurement and supply chain, manufacturing and accounts payable. In addition, we use enterprise information technology systems to record, process, and summarize transactions and other financial information and results of operations for internal reporting purposes and to comply with regulatory financial reporting, legal, and tax requirements. Our information technology systems may be susceptible to damage, disruptions or shutdowns due to computer viruses, attacks by computer hackers, failures during the process of upgrading or replacing software, databases or comp1nts thereof, power outages, hardware failures, telecommunication failures, user errors or catastrophic events. Any failure by us to maintain or protect our information technology systems and data integrity, including from cyber attacks, intrusions, disruptions or shutdowns, could result in the unauthorized access to patient data and personally identifiable information, theft of intellectual property or other misappropriation of assets or the loss of key data and information, or otherwise compromise our confidential or proprietary information and disrupt our operations. If our information technology systems are breached or suffer severe damage, disruption or shutdown and we are unable to effectively resolve the issues in a timely manner, our business and operating results may be materially and adversely affected. Technological breakthroughs in diabetes monitoring, treatment or prevention could render the Omnipod System obsolete. In addition, our own new product development initiatives may prove to be ineffective or not commercially successful. The diabetes treatment market is subject to rapid technological change and product innovation. The Omnipod System is based on our proprietary technology, but a number of companies, medical researchers and existing pharmaceutical companies are pursuing new delivery devices, delivery technologies, sensing technologies, procedures, drugs and other therapeutics for the monitoring, treatment and or prevention of insulin dependent diabetes. For example, FDA approval of a commercially viable closed loop or "hybrid closed loop" system that combines continuous real time glucose sensing or monitoring and automatic continuous subcutaneous insulin infusion in a manner that delivers appropriate amounts of insulin on a timely basis with reduced patient direction could have a material adverse effect on our revenue and future profitability. Medtronic has developed a "hybrid closed loop" system with FDA approval, which was commercially launched in 2017 and which could negatively impact our business. In addition, the National Institutes of Health and other supporters of diabetes research are continually seeking ways to prevent, cure or improve the treatment of diabetes. Any technological breakthroughs in diabetes monitoring, treatment or prevention could render the Omnipod System obsolete, which would have a material adverse effect on our business, financial condition and results of operations. We also have ongoing initiatives to develop products to improve the treatment of Type 1 diabetes and to treat patients with highly insulin resistant Type 2 diabetes. For example, we are working with DexCom to integrate its continuous glucose monitoring technology with the Omnipod System and we continue to explore partnership opportunities with other companies that have blood glucose monitoring and continuous glucose monitoring technologies. We are also developing with Eli Lilly and Company a new version of the Omnipod System specifically designed to deliver Humulin R U 500 and U 200 insulin, which are more concentrated forms of 24 Table of Contents insulin than traditional U 100 insulin for patients with higher insulin resistance. In each of these cases, these projects will require substantial clinical support and are subject to regulatory approvals. No assurances can be given that these or other development initiatives by us will be successful. The failure to successfully bring any of these products to market could have an adverse effect on our business and results of operations. If our existing license agreement with Abbott is terminated or we fail to enter into new license agreements allowing us to incorporate a blood glucose meter into the Omnipod System, or if Abbott's FreeStyle meter is less desirable to our current and potential customers, our business may be materially adversely impacted. Our rights to incorporate the FreeStyle blood glucose meter into the Omnipod System are governed by a development and license agreement with Abbott. This agreement provides us with a non exclusive, fully paid, non transferable and non sublicensable license in the United States under patents and other relevant technical information relating to the FreeStyle blood glucose meter during the term of the agreement. As amended, this agreement runs through January 2020. The agreement may be terminated or limited in geographical scope by Abbott or us under certain circumstances. Termination of this agreement could require us to either remove the blood glucose meter from PDMs to be sold in the future, which could impair the functionality of the Omnipod System, or attempt to incorporate an alternative blood glucose meter into the PDM, either of which would require significant development and regulatory activities that might not be completed in time to prevent an interruption in the availability of the Omnipod System to our customers, which could have a material adverse effect on our business, financial condition and results of operations. The FreeStyle blood glucose meter in our PDM is only approved for use with FreeStyle test strips in the United States. Not all third party payors reimburse patients for the purchase and use of FreeStyle test strips to the same extent as they reimburse patients for other brands of test strips. The absence or reduction in such reimbursement or availability of the test strips may make the Omnipod System less desirable to our current and potential customers. In the future, we may need additional agreements or licenses to intellectual property or other rights in order to sell our current product or commercialize new products. If we cannot obtain these agreements, licenses, or other rights, we may not be able to sell, develop or commercialize these products. Our rights to use technologies licensed to us by third parties are not entirely within our control, and we may not be able to continue selling the Omnipod System or sell future products without these rights. Our non insulin drug delivery product line faces challenges which, if not met, may impair its future success and continued growth. Our non insulin drug delivery product line has grown substantially over the past years. This product line typically involves the development, manufacturing and sale of a modified Omnipod System for delivery of a specific drug other than insulin. The marketing and sales initiatives driving this product line differ markedly from those on which we rely for our sales of Omnipod Systems to treat diabetes since the non insulin drug delivery devices depend on marketing and sales to pharmaceutical companies, not to patients and clinicians. We expect that the continued success of our non insulin drug delivery product line will face several challenges, including our identification of drug delivery opportunities appropriate for a modified Omnipod System; our achievement of satisfactory development and pricing terms with the pharmaceutical companies that sell such drugs; our development of appropriate modifications to our Omnipod System technology to address the needs and parameters required for the respective drug delivery opportunities; manufacturing issues relating to the modified Omnipod System; long lead times associated with the development, regulatory approvals and ramp up applicable to the use of modified Omnipod Systems for the delivery of such drugs; relatively small number of modified Omnipod Systems needed to address each drug delivery opportunity; uncertainties regarding the market acceptance of such drugs and the modified Omnipod Systems as appropriate delivery devices; 25 Table of Contents uncertainties relating to the success of the pharmaceutical companies in marketing and selling such drugs as well as the modified Omnipod Systems as the appropriate delivery devices; intense competition in the drug delivery industry, including from competitors which have substantially greater resources than we do; maintaining appropriate gross margins; and regulatory requirements and reimbursement rates associated with such drugs. If we are unsuccessful in overcoming 1 or more of these challenges, our ability to capitalize on these opportunities and to continue to grow our non insulin drug delivery product line could be significantly impaired, which in turn could materially and adversely impact our business and financial results. The patent rights on which we rely to protect the intellectual property underlying our products may not be adequate, which could enable third parties to use our technology and would harm our continued ability to compete in the market. Our success will depend in part on our continued ability to develop or acquire commercially valuable patent rights and to protect these rights adequately. Our patent position is generally uncertain and involves complex legal and factual questions. The risks and uncertainties that we face with respect to our patents and other related rights include the following the pending patent applications we have filed or to which we have exclusive rights may not result in issued patents or may take longer than we expect to result in issued patents; the claims of any patents that are issued may not provide meaningful protection; we may not be able to develop additional proprietary technologies that are patentable; and other companies may design around technologies we have patented, licensed or developed. We also may not be able to protect our patent rights effectively in some foreign countries. For a variety of reasons, we may decide not to file for patent protection. Our patent rights underlying the our products may not be adequate, and our competitors or customers may design around our proprietary technologies or independently develop similar or alternative technologies or products that are equal or superior to ours without infringing on any of our patent rights. In addition, the patents licensed or issued to us may not provide a competitive advantage. The occurrence of any of these events may have a material adverse effect on our business, financial condition and results of operations. Other rights and measures we have taken to protect our intellectual property may not be adequate, which would harm our ability to compete in the market. In addition to patents, we rely on a combination of trade secrets, copyright and trademark laws, confidentiality, non disclosure and assignment of invention agreements and other contractual provisions and technical measures to protect our intellectual property rights. Despite these measures, any of our intellectual property rights could be challenged, invalidated, circumvented or misappropriated. While we currently require employees, consultants and other third parties to enter into confidentiality, non disclosure or assignment of invention agreements, or a combination thereof where appropriate, any of the following could still occur the agreements may be breached; we may have inadequate remedies for any breach; trade secrets and other proprietary information could be disclosed to our competitors; or others may independently develop substantially equivalent or superior proprietary information and techniques or otherwise gain access to our trade secrets or disclose such technologies. If, for any of the above reasons, our intellectual property is disclosed or misappropriated, it would harm our ability to protect our rights and have a material adverse effect on our business, financial condition and results of operations. 26 Table of Contents We may need to initiate lawsuits to protect or enforce our patents and other intellectual property rights, which could be expensive and, if we lose, could cause us to lose some of our intellectual property rights, which would harm our ability to compete in the market. We rely on patents to protect a portion of our intellectual property and our competitive position. The patent laws that relate to the scope of claims in the technology fields in which we operate are still evolving and, consequently, certain patent positions in the medical device industry are generally uncertain. In order to protect or enforce our patent rights, we may initiate patent litigation against third parties, such as infringement suits or interference proceedings. Litigation may be necessary to assert claims of infringement; enforce our patents; protect our trade secrets or know how; or determine the enforceability, scope and validity of the proprietary rights of others. Any lawsuits that we initiate could be expensive, take significant time and divert management attention from other business concerns. Litigation also puts our patents at risk of being invalidated or interpreted narrowly and our patent applications at risk of not issuing. Additionally, we may provoke third parties to assert claims against us. We may not prevail in any lawsuits that we initiate and the damages or other remedies awarded, if any, may not be commercially valuable. The occurrence of any of these events could have a material adverse effect on our business, financial condition and results of operations. Claims that our current or future products infringe or misappropriate the proprietary rights of others could adversely affect our ability to sell those products and cause us to incur additional costs. Substantial litigation over intellectual property rights exists in the medical device industry, and we have settled infringement suits in the past. We expect that we could be increasingly subject to third party infringement claims as our revenue increases, the number of competitors grows and the functionality of products and technology in different industry segments overlaps. Third parties may currently have, or may eventually be issued, patents on which our current or future products or technologies may infringe. Any of these third parties might make a claim of infringement against us. Such litigation, regardless of its outcome, could result in the expenditure of significant financial resources and the diversion of management time and resources. In addition, such litigation could cause negative publicity, adversely affect prospective customers, cause product shipment delays, limit or prohibit us from manufacturing, marketing or selling our current or future products, require us to develop non infringing technology, make substantial payments to third parties or enter into royalty or license agreements, which may not be available on acceptable terms or at all. If a successful claim of infringement were made against us and we could not develop non infringing technology or license the infringed or similar technology on a timely and cost effective basis, our revenue could decrease substantially and we could be exposed to significant liability. A court could enter orders that temporarily, preliminarily or permanently enjoin us or our customers from making, using, selling, offering to sell or importing our current or future products, or could enter an order mandating that we undertake certain remedial activities. We are subject to extensive government regulation, both in the United States and abroad, which could restrict the sales and marketing of our products and could cause us to incur significant costs. Our medical device products and operations are subject to extensive regulation by the FDA and various other federal, state, local and foreign government authorities. Government regulation of medical devices is meant to assure their safety and effectiveness, and includes regulation of, among other things design, development and manufacturing; testing, labeling, content and language of instructions for use and storage; clinical trials; product safety; marketing, sales and distribution; regulatory clearances and approvals including premarket clearance and approval; 27 Table of Contents conformity assessment procedures; product traceability and record keeping procedures; advertising and promotion; product complaints, complaint reporting, recalls and field safety corrective actions; post market surveillance, including reporting of deaths or serious injuries and malfunctions that, if they were to recur, could lead to death or serious injury; post market studies; and product import and export. The regulations to which we are subject are complex and have tended to become more stringent over time. Regulatory changes could result in restrictions on our ability to carry on or expand our operations, higher than anticipated costs or lower than anticipated sales. Before a new medical device, or a significant modification of a medical device, including a new use of or a new use of or claim for an existing product, can be marketed in the United States, it must first receive either 510(k) clearance or PMA from the FDA, unless an exemption applies. In the 510(k) clearance process, the FDA must determine that a proposed device is "substantially equivalent" to a device legally on the market, known as a "predicate" device, with respect to intended use, technology and safety and effectiveness, in order to clear the proposed device for marketing. Clinical data is sometimes required to support substantial equivalence. In December 2012 we received 501(k) clearance for our new Omnipod System. We have since obtained clearance for modified versions of this device. We may be required to obtain a new 510(k) clearance or pre market approval for significant further post market modifications to the Omnipod System. Obtaining 510(k) clearance or pre market approval for medical devices can be expensive and lengthy, and entail significant user fees, unless an exemption is available. The FDA process for obtaining 510(k) clearance usually takes 3 to twelve months, but it can last longer. In the PMA approval process, the FDA must determine that a proposed device is safe and effective for its intended use based, in part, on extensive data, including but not limited to, technical, pre clinical, clinical trial, manufacturing and labeling data. The process for obtaining pre market approval is much more costly and uncertain and it generally takes from 1 to 3 years, or longer, from the time the application is filed with the FDA. Modifications to products that are approved through a PMA application generally need FDA approval. We expect that some of our future products will require PMA approval. In addition, the FDA may demand that we obtain a PMA prior to marketing future changes of our existing Omnipod System. Further, we may not be able to obtain additional 510(k) clearances or pre market approvals for new products or for modifications to, or additional indications for, the Omnipod System in a timely fashion or at all. Delays in obtaining future clearances could adversely affect our ability to introduce new or enhanced products in a timely manner which in turn could harm our revenue and future profitability. We also are subject to numerous post marketing regulatory requirements, which include quality system regulations related to the manufacturing of our devices, labeling regulations and medical device reporting regulations. The last of these regulations requires us to report to the FDA if our devices cause or contribute to a death or serious injury, or malfunction in a way that would likely cause or contribute to a death or serious injury. If we fail to comply with present or future regulatory requirements that are applicable to us, we may be subject to enforcement action by the FDA, which may include any of the following sanctions untitled letters, warning letters, fines, injunctions, consent decrees and civil penalties; customer notification, or orders for repair, replacement or refunds; voluntary or mandatory recall or seizure of our current or future products; administrative detention by the FDA of medical devices believed to be adulterated or misbranded; imposing operating restrictions, suspension or shutdown of production; refusing our requests for 510(k) clearance or pre market approval of new products, new intended uses or modifications to the Omnipod System; 28 Table of Contents rescinding 510(k) clearance or suspending or withdrawing pre market approvals that have already been granted; and criminal prosecution. The occurrence of any of these events may have a material adverse effect on our business, financial condition and results of operations. In addition, the FDA may change its clearance and approval policies, adopt additional regulations or revise existing regulations, or take other actions that may prevent or delay approval or clearance of our products under development or impact our ability to modify our currently approved or cleared products on a timely basis. For example, as part of the 21 st Century Act passed in 2016, Congress enacted several reforms that further affect medical device regulation both pre and post approval. While those changes are still being implemented by FDA, this serves as an example of the rapidly changing regulatory environment in which we operate. In addition, regulatory requirements may change in the future in a way that adversely affects us. For instance, the FDA is in the process of reviewing the 510(k) approval process and criteria and has announced initiatives to improve the current pre market and post market regulatory processes and requirements associated with infusion pumps and other home use medical devices. As part of this effort, the FDA is reviewing the adverse event reporting and recall processes for insulin pumps. Any change in the laws or regulations that govern the clearance and approval processes relating to our current and future products could make it more difficult and costly to obtain clearance or approval for new products, or to produce, market and distribute existing products. The Omnipod System is also sold in a number of European countries, Canada and Israel. As a result, we are required to comply with additional foreign regulatory requirements. For example, in April 2009, we first received CE Mark approval for our Omnipod System. The CE Mark gives us authorization to distribute the Omnipod System throughout the European Union and in other countries that recognize the CE Mark. Additionally, in September 2009, we first received Health Canada approval to distribute the Omnipod System throughout Canada. As we expand our sales efforts internationally, we may need to obtain additional foreign approval certifications. There is no guarantee that the FDA will grant 510(k) clearance or PMA approval of our future products, and failure to obtain necessary clearances or approvals for our future products would adversely affect our ability to grow our business. Some of our new or modified products will require FDA clearance of a 510(k) or FDA approval of a PMA. The FDA may not approve or clear these products for the indications that are necessary or desirable for successful commercialization. Indeed, the FDA may refuse our requests for 510(k) clearance or premarket approval of new products. Even early stage review may result in issues. For example, the FDA has issued guidance documents intended to explain the procedures and criteria the FDA will use in assessing whether a 510(k) and PMA submissions meets a minimum threshold of acceptability and should be accepted for substantive review. Under the Refuse to Accept guidance, the FDA conducts an early review against specific acceptance criteria to inform 510(k) and PMA submitters if the submission is administratively complete, or if not, to identify the missing element(s). Submitters are given the opportunity to provide the FDA with the identified information. If the information is not provided within a defined time, the submission will not be accepted for FDA review. Significant delays in receiving clearance or approval, or the failure to receive clearance or approval for our new products would have an adverse effect on our ability to expand our business. 29 Table of Contents If we, our contract manufacturer or our comp1nt suppliers fail to comply with the FDA quality system regulations, the manufacturing and distribution of our devices could be interrupted, and our product sales and operating results could suffer. We, our contract manufacturer and our comp1nt suppliers are required to comply with the FDA quality system regulations ("QSR"), which is a complex regulatory framework that covers the procedures and documentation of the design, testing, production, control, quality assurance, labeling, packaging, sterilization, storage and shipping of our devices. Compliance with applicable regulatory requirements is subject to continual review and is monitored rigorously through periodic, sometimes unannounced, inspections by the FDA. We cannot assure you that our facilities or our contract manufacturer or comp1nt suppliers facilities would pass any future quality system inspection. If our or any of our contract manufacturer or comp1nt suppliers facilities fails a quality system inspection, the manufacturing or distribution of our devices could be interrupted and our operations disrupted. Failure to take adequate and timely corrective action in response to an adverse quality system inspection could force a suspension or shutdown of our labeling operations or the manufacturing operations of our contract manufacturer, or a recall of our devices. If we, or our manufacturers, fail to adhere to QSR requirements, this could delay production of our products and lead to fines, difficulties in obtaining regulatory clearances, recalls, enforcement actions, including injunctive relief or consent decrees, or other consequences, which could, in turn, have a material adverse effect on our financial condition or results of operations. If our products, or malfunction of our products, cause or contribute to a death or a serious injury, we will be subject to medical device reporting regulations, which can result in voluntary corrective actions or agency enforcement actions. Under the FDA medical device reporting regulations, medical device manufacturers are required to report to the FDA information that a device has or may have caused or contributed to a death or serious injury or has malfuncti1d in a way that would likely cause or contribute to death or serious injury if the malfunction of the device or 1 of our similar devices were to recur. Any such adverse event involving our products could result in future voluntary corrective actions, such as recalls or customer notifications, or agency action, such as inspection or enforcement action. Adverse events involving our products have been reported to us in the past, and we cannot guarantee that they will not occur in the future. Any corrective action, whether voluntary or involuntary, will require the dedication of our time and capital, distract management from operating our business and may harm our reputation and financial results. Our current or future products may be subject to product recalls even after receiving FDA clearance or approval. A recall of our products, either voluntarily or at the direction of the FDA, or the discovery of serious safety issues with our products, could have a significant adverse impact on us. The FDA and similar governmental bodies in other countries have the authority to require the recall of our current or future products if we or our contract manufacturers fail to comply with relevant regulations pertaining to manufacturing practices, labeling, advertising or promotional activities, or if new information is obtained concerning the safety or efficacy of these products. For example, under the FDA medical device reporting, or MDR, regulations, we are required to report to the FDA any incident in which our product may have caused or contributed to a death or serious injury or in which our product malfuncti1d and, if the malfunction were to recur, would likely cause or contribute to death or serious injury. Repeated product malfunctions may result in a voluntary or involuntary product recall. A government mandated recall could occur if the FDA finds that there is a reasonable probability that the device would cause serious, adverse health consequences or death. A voluntary recall by us could occur as a result of any material deficiency in a device, such as manufacturing defects, labeling deficiencies, packaging defects or other failures to comply with applicable regulations. In general, if we decide to make a change to our product, we are responsible for determining whether to classify the change as a recall. It is possible that the FDA could disagree with our initial classification. The FDA requires that certain classifications of recalls be reported to the FDA within 10 working days after the recall is initiated. In general if any change or group of changes to a device addresses a violation of the Federal Food, Drug, and Cosmetic Act, that change would generally constitute a medical device recall and require submission of a recall report to the FDA. 30 Table of Contents Recalls of any of our products would divert managerial and financial resources and have an adverse effect on our reputation, results of operations and financial condition, which could impair our ability to produce our products in a cost effective and timely manner in order to meet our customers demands. We may also be subject to liability claims, be required to bear other costs, or take other actions that may have a negative impact on our future sales and our ability to generate profits. Companies are required to maintain certain records of recalls, even if they are not reportable to the FDA. We may initiate voluntary recalls involving our products in the future that we determine do not require notification of the FDA. If the FDA disagrees with our determinations, they could require us to report those actions as recalls. A future recall announcement could harm our reputation with customers and negatively affect our sales. In addition, the FDA could take enforcement action for failing to report the recalls when they were conducted. Further, under the FDA medical device reporting, or MDR, regulations, we are required to report to the FDA any incident in which our product may have caused or contributed to a death or serious injury or in which our product malfuncti1d and, if the malfunction were to recur, would likely cause or contribute to death or serious injury. Repeated product malfunctions may result in a voluntary or involuntary product recall, which could divert managerial and financial resources, impair our ability to manufacture our products in a cost effective and timely manner, and have an adverse effect on our reputation, results of operations and financial condition. We are also required to follow detailed recordkeeping requirements for all firm initiated medical device corrections and removals, and to report such corrective and removal actions to FDA if they are carried out in response to a risk to health and have not otherwise been reported under the MDR regulations. If the third parties on which we rely to conduct our clinical trials and to assist us with pre clinical development do not perform as contractually required or expected, we may not be able to obtain regulatory clearance or approval or commercialize our products. We rely on third parties, such as contract research organizations, medical institutions, clinical investigators, contract laboratories and other third parties to conduct some of our clinical trials and pre clinical investigations. If these third parties do not successfully carry out their contractual duties or regulatory obligations or meet expected deadlines, or if the quality or accuracy of the data they obtain is compromised due to the failure to adhere to our clinical protocols or regulatory requirements or for other reasons, our pre clinical development activities or clinical trials may be extended, delayed, suspended or terminated, and we may not be able to obtain regulatory approval for, or successfully commercialize, our products on a timely basis, if at all, and our business, operating results and prospects may be adversely affected. Furthermore, our third party clinical trial investigators may be delayed in conducting our clinical trials for reasons outside of their control. We may be subject to enforcement action if we engage in improper marketing or promotion of our products. Our promotional materials and training methods must comply with FDA and other applicable laws and regulations, including the prohibition of the promotion of unapproved, or off label, use. Doctors may use our products off label, as the FDA does not restrict or regulate a doctor choice of treatment within the practice of medicine. However, if the FDA determines that our promotional materials or training constitutes promotion of an off label use, it could request that we modify our training or promotional materials or subject us to regulatory or enforcement actions, including the issuance of an untitled letter, a warning letter, injunction, seizure, civil fine or criminal penalties. It is also possible that other federal, state or foreign enforcement authorities might take action if they consider our promotional or training materials to constitute promotion of an off label use, which could result in significant fines or penalties under other statutory authorities, such as laws prohibiting false claims for reimbursement. In that event, our reputation could be damaged and adoption of the products could be impaired. Although our policy is to refrain from statements that could be considered off label promotion of our products, the FDA or another regulatory agency could disagree and conclude that we have engaged in off label promotion. In addition, the off label use of our products may increase the risk of product liability claims. Product liability claims are expensive to defend and could divert our management attention, result in substantial damage awards against us, and harm our reputation. 31 Table of Contents We are subject to federal, state and foreign laws prohibiting kickbacks and false or fraudulent claims, and other fraud and abuse laws, transparency laws, and other health care laws and regulations, which, if violated, could subject us to substantial penalties. Additionally, any challenge to or investigation into our practices under these laws could cause adverse publicity and be costly to respond to, and thus could harm our business. Our relationships with customers and third party payers are subject to broadly applicable fraud and abuse and other health care laws and regulations that may constrain our sales, marketing and other promotional activities by limiting the kinds of financial arrangements, including sales programs, we may have with hospitals, physicians, patients or other potential purchasers of medical devices. These laws include the Federal Anti Kickback Statute, the Federal False Claims Act, other federal health care false statement and fraud statutes, the Open Payments program, the Civil M1tary Penalties Law, and analogous fraud and abuse and transparency laws in most states, as described in greater detail in the section above entitled Government Regulation . We conduct various marketing and product training activities that involve making payments to healthcare providers and entities. While we believe and make every effort to ensure that our business arrangements with third parties and other activities comply with all applicable laws, these laws are complex and our activities may be found not to be compliant with 1 of these laws, which may result in significant civil, criminal and or administrative penalties. Even an unsuccessful challenge or investigation into our practices could cause adverse publicity, and be costly to respond to, and thus could have a material adverse effect on our business, financial condition and results of operations. Our compliance with Medicare and Medicaid regulations may be reviewed by federal or state agencies, including the United States Department of Health and Human Services Office of the Inspector General ( OIG ), CMS, and the Department of Justice. To ensure compliance with Medicare, Medicaid and other regulations, government agencies conduct periodic audits of us to ensure compliance with various supplier standards and billing requirements. If we are found to have violated laws protecting the confidentiality of patient health information, we could be subject to civil or criminal penalties, which could increase our liabilities and harm our reputation or our business. There are a number of federal and state laws protecting the confidentiality of certain patient health information, including patient records, and restricting the use and disclosure of that protected information. In particular, the U.S. Department of Health and Human Services promulgated patient privacy rules under HIPAA. These privacy rules protect medical records and other personal health information by limiting their use and disclosure, giving individuals the right to access, amend and seek accounting of their own health information and limiting most use and disclosures of health information to the minimum amount reasonably necessary to accomplish the intended purpose. If we are found to be in violation of the privacy rules under HIPAA, we could be subject to civil or criminal penalties, which could increase our liabilities, harm our reputation and have a material adverse effect on our business, financial condition and results of operations. We are subject to complex and evolving U.S. and foreign laws and regulations regarding privacy, data protection, and other matters. Many of these laws and regulations are subject to change and uncertain interpretation, and could result in claims, changes to our business practices, m1tary penalties, increased cost of operations, or declines in user growth or engagement, or otherwise harm our business. We are subject to a variety of laws and regulations in the United States and abroad that involve matters central to our business, including laws and regulations relating to privacy and data protection, rights of publicity, content, intellectual property, advertising, marketing, distribution, data security, data retention and deletion, personal information, electronic contracts and other communications, competition, protection of minors, consumer protection, telecommunications, product liability, taxation, economic or other trade prohibitions or sanctions, corrupt practices, fraud, waste and abuse restrictions, and securities law compliance. The introduction of new products or expansion of our activities in certain jurisdictions may subject us to additional laws and regulations. For example, data protection laws passed by the federal government, many states and foreign countries require notification to users when there is a security breach for personal data. In addition, foreign data protection, privacy, and other laws and regulations can be more restrictive than those in the United States. For example, data localization laws in some countries generally mandate that certain types of data 32 Table of Contents collected in a particular country be stored and or processed within that country. We could be subject to audits in Europe and around the world, particularly in the areas of consumer and data protection, as we continue to grow and expand our operations. Legislators and regulators may make legal and regulatory changes, or interpret and apply existing laws, in ways that make our products less useful to our customers, require us to incur substantial costs, expose us to unanticipated civil or criminal liability, or cause us to change our business practices. These changes or increased costs could negatively impact our business and results of operations in material ways. Product liability suits, whether or not meritorious, could be brought against us due to an alleged defective product or for the misuse of our devices. These suits could result in expensive and time consuming litigation, payment of substantial damages, and an increase in our insurance rates. If our current or future products are defectively designed or manufactured, contain defective comp1nts or are misused, or if some1 claims any of the foregoing, whether or not meritorious, we may become subject to substantial and costly litigation. Misusing our devices or failing to adhere to the operating guidelines of the Omnipod System or other products based on the Omnipod System technology could cause significant harm to patients, including death. In addition, if our operating guidelines are found to be inadequate, we may be subject to liability. Product liability claims could divert management attention from our core business, be expensive to defend and result in sizable damage awards against us. While we believe that we are reasonably insured against these risks, we may not have sufficient insurance coverage for all future claims. Any product liability claims brought against us, with or without merit, could increase our product liability insurance rates or prevent us from securing continuing coverage, could harm our reputation in the industry and could reduce revenue. Product liability claims in excess of our insurance coverage would be paid out of cash reserves harming our financial condition and adversely affecting our results of operations. Our ability to grow our revenue depends in part on our retaining a high percentage of our customer base. A key to driving our revenue growth is the retention of a high percentage of our customers. We have developed retention programs aimed at both healthcare professionals and patients, which include appeals assistance, ongoing patient communications, newsletters, support, training and an automatic re order program for certain patients. We have had a satisfactory customer retention rate; however, we cannot assure you that we will maintain this retention rate in the future. Current uncertainty in global economic conditions, higher levels of unemployment, changes in insurance reimbursement levels and negative financial news may negatively affect product demand. If demand for our products fluctuates as a result of economic conditions or otherwise, our ability to attract and retain customers could be harmed. The failure to retain a high percentage of our customers would negatively impact our revenue growth and may have a material adverse effect on our business, financial condition and results of operations. Under our distribution model, we depend on a small number of customers, including distributors, for a large portion of our business, and changes in orders from such customers could have a significant impact on our operating results. If a major customer, either in our insulin or non insulin drug delivery businesses significantly reduces the amount of business it does with us, there would be an adverse impact on our operating results. Revenue for customers comprising more than 10% of total revenue were as follows Twelve Months Ended December 31, 2017 2016 2015 Amgen, Inc. 15% 17% 10% Ypsomed Distribution AG 22% 16% 12% RGH Enterprises, Inc. 11% 10% 13% 33 Table of Contents We have sponsored, and expect to continue to sponsor market studies seeking to demonstrate certain aspects of the efficacy of the Omnipod System, which may fail to produce favorable results. To help improve, market and sell the Omnipod System, we have sponsored, and expect to continue to sponsor market studies to assess various aspects of the Omnipod System functionality and its relative efficacy. The data obtained from the studies may be unfavorable to the Omnipod System or may be inadequate to support satisfactory conclusions. In addition, in the future we may sponsor clinical trials to assess certain aspects of the efficacy of the Omnipod System. If future clinical trials fail to support the efficacy of our current or future products, our sales may be adversely affected and we may lose an opportunity to secure clinical preference from prescribing clinicians, which may have a material adverse effect on our business, financial condition and results of operations. If future clinical studies or other articles are published, or diabetes associations or other organizations announce positions that are unfavorable to the Omnipod System, our sales efforts and revenue may be negatively affected. Future clinical studies or other articles regarding our existing products or any competing products may be published that either support a claim, or are perceived to support a claim, that a competitor product is clinically more effective or easier to use than the Omnipod System or that the Omnipod System is not as effective or easy to use as we claim. Additionally, diabetes associations, healthcare providers that focus on diabetes or other organizations that may be viewed as authoritative could endorse products or methods that compete with the Omnipod System or otherwise announce positions that are unfavorable to the Omnipod System. Any of these events may negatively affect our sales efforts and result in decreased revenue. Substantially all of our operations related to the Omnipod System are conducted at a single location and substantially all of our Omnipod System inventory is held at a single location. Any disruption at either of these locations could increase our expenses. Substantially all of our manufacturing of complete Omnipod Systems is currently conducted at a single location on manufacturing lines owned by us at a facility located in China, operated by a subsidiary of Flex. We take precautions to ensure that Flex safeguards our assets, including insurance and health and safety protocols. However, a natural or other disaster, such as a fire or flood, could cause substantial delays in our operations, damage or destroy our manufacturing equipment, and cause us to incur additional expenses. The insurance we maintain may not be adequate to cover our losses in any particular case. With or without insurance, damage to our manufacturing equipment, or to any of our suppliers, may have a material adverse effect on our business, financial condition and results of operations. In addition, substantially all of our Omnipod System inventory is held at a single location in Massachusetts. We take precautions to safeguard our facility, including insurance, health and safety protocols and off site storage of computer data. However, a natural or other disaster, such as a fire or flood, could cause substantial delays in our operations, damage or destroy our inventory, and cause us to incur additional expenses. The insurance we maintain may not be adequate to cover our losses in any particular case. With or without insurance, damage to our facility or our other property may have a material adverse effect on our business, financial condition and results of operations. If we do not effectively manage the construction of our planned manufacturing facility in the U.S., our results of operations may be adversely affected. To lower our manufacturing costs, increase supply redundancy and add capacity to support growth, we are constructing a highly automated manufacturing facility in Acton, Massachusetts. This facility will also serve as our global headquarters. As of December 31, 2017, we had outstanding purchase commitments with various suppliers for the construction of the facility. To date, we have incurred capital expenditures of approximately $70 million related to this facility and we expect that capital expenditures for this facility will approach $200 million when production begins in 2019. These costs could increase significantly and there is no assurance that the final cost of the facility will not be materially higher than anticipated. There may be design changes, material cost escalations or budgetary overruns associated with the construction. We may experience delays in the construction of our planned manufacturing facility. We may also encounter defects in materials and or workmanship in connection with construction which could lead to a failure to adhere to compliance requirements. Any defects could delay the commencement of operations of the facility, lead to fines 34 Table of Contents from non compliance of regulatory requirements, or, if such defects are discovered after operations have commenced, could halt or discontinue the facility indefinitely. Our success will depend on our ability to attract and retain personnel. Over the last several years, we have made significant changes to our senior management team and to many other positions throughout the Company. We believe we will benefit substantially from the leadership and performance of these new employees. As such, our success will depend on our ability to retain our new employees and to attract and retain additional qualified personnel in the future. In addition, it is important to the success of the Company that the transition of the new employees be largely seamless. Competition for senior management personnel, and other highly skilled personnel is intense and there can be no assurances that we will be able to retain our personnel. The loss of the services of members of our senior management, and other highly skilled personnel could prevent or delay the implementation and completion of our objectives, or divert management attention to seeking qualified replacements. Additionally, the sale and after sale support of the Omnipod System is logistically complex, requiring us to maintain an extensive infrastructure of field sales personnel, diabetes educators, customer support, insurance specialists, and billing and collections personnel. We face considerable challenges in recruiting, training, managing, motivating and retaining these teams, including managing geographically dispersed efforts. If we fail to maintain and grow an adequate pool of trained and motivated personnel, our reputation could suffer and our financial position could be adversely affected. If we do not effectively manage our growth, our business resources may become strained and we may not be able to deliver the Omnipod System in a timely manner, which could harm our results of operations. Since the commercial launch of the Omnipod System, we have progressively expanded our marketing efforts to cover the entire United States. In addition, the Omnipod System is sold in a number of European countries, Canada and Israel. As we continue to expand our sales internationally, including our assumption of the distribution, sales, marketing, training and support activities of our Omnipod System across Europe following the expiration of our global distribution agreement with our European distributor on June 30, 2018, we will need to obtain regulatory approvals and reimbursement agreements with government agencies or private third party payors in those countries. Failure to obtain such agreements would limit our ability to successfully penetrate those foreign, including the European, markets. In addition, the geographic expansion of our business will require additional manufacturing capacity to supply those markets as well as additional sales and marketing resources. We expect to continue to increase our manufacturing capacity, our personnel and the scope of our U.S. and international sales and marketing efforts. This growth, as well as any other growth that we may experience in the future, will provide challenges to our organization and may strain our management and operations resources. In order to manage future growth, we will be required to improve existing, and implement new, sales and marketing efforts and distribution channels. The form and function of our enterprise information technology systems will need to change and be improved upon as our business needs change. We will need to manage our supply chain effectively, including the development of our U.S. manufacturing, our relationship with Flex and other suppliers going forward. We may also need to partner with additional third party suppliers to manufacture certain comp1nts of the Omnipod System and complete additional manufacturing lines in the future. A transition to new suppliers may result in additional costs or delays. We may misjudge the amount of time or resources that will be required to effectively manage any anticipated or unanticipated growth in our business or we may not be able to manufacture sufficient inventory, or attract, hire and retain sufficient personnel to meet our needs. If we cannot scale our business appropriately, maintain control over expenses or otherwise adapt to anticipated and unanticipated growth, our business resources may become strained, we may not be able to deliver the Omnipod System in a timely manner and our results of operations may be adversely affected. If we choose to acquire or invest in new businesses, products or technologies, instead of developing them ourselves, these acquisitions or investments could disrupt our business and could result in the use of significant amounts of equity, cash or a combination of both. 35 Table of Contents From time to time we may seek to acquire or invest in new businesses, products or technologies, instead of developing them ourselves. Acquisitions and investments involve numerous risks, including the inability to complete the acquisition or investment; disruption of our ongoing businesses and diversion of management attention; difficulties in integrating the acquired entities, products or technologies; risks associated with acquiring intellectual property; difficulties in operating the acquired business profitably; the inability to achieve anticipated synergies, cost savings or growth; potential loss of key employees, particularly those of the acquired business; difficulties in transitioning and maintaining key customer, distributor and supplier relationships; risks associated with entering markets in which we have no or limited prior experience; and unanticipated costs. In addition, any future acquisitions or investments may result in 1 or more of the following dilutive issuances of equity securities, which may be sold at a discount to market price; the use of significant amounts of cash; the incurrence of debt; the assumption of significant liabilities; increased operating costs or reduced earnings; financing obtained on unfavorable terms; large 1 time expenses; and the creation of certain intangible assets, including goodwill, the write down of which in future periods may result in significant charges to earnings. Any of these factors could materially harm our stock price, business, financial condition and results of operations. We need to expand our distribution ne2rk to maintain and grow our business and revenue. If we fail to expand and maintain an effective sales force or successfully develop our relationships with distributors, our business, prospects and brand may be materially and adversely affected. We currently promote, market and sell the majority of our Omnipod Systems through our own direct sales force. We currently utilize a limited number of domestic distributors to augment our sales efforts. In addition, in January 2010 we entered into an exclusive distribution agreement with our European distributor to promote, advertise, distribute and sell the Omnipod System in certain countries. This agreement expires in mid 2018, at which point we will assume the distribution, sales, marketing, training and support activities of our Omnipod System across Europe. In addition to the Omnipod System, our European distributor also markets and sells a suite of other products for the treatment of diabetes and has introduced and sells its own branded conventional insulin pump. We cannot assure you that we will be able to successfully develop our relationships with third party distributors. If we fail to do so, our sales could fail to grow or could decline, and our ability to grow our business could be adversely affected. Distributors that are in the business of selling other medical products may not devote a sufficient level of resources and support required to generate awareness of our products and grow or maintain product sales. If our distributors are unwilling or unable to market and sell our products, or if they do not perform to our expectations, we could experience delayed or reduced market acceptance and sales of our products. 36 Table of Contents If we are unable to successfully maintain effective internal control over financial reporting, investors may lose confidence in our reported financial information and our stock price and our business may be adversely impacted. As a public company, we are required to maintain internal control over financial reporting and our management is required to evaluate the effectiveness of our internal control over financial reporting as of the end of each fiscal year. Additionally, we are required to disclose in our Annual Reports on Form 10 K our management assessment of the effectiveness of our internal control over financial reporting along with a registered public accounting firm attestation report on the effectiveness of our internal controls. If we are not successful in maintaining effective internal control over financial reporting, there could be inaccuracies or omissions in the consolidated financial information we are required to file with the Securities and Exchange Commission. Additionally, even if there are no inaccuracies or omissions, we will be required to publicly disclose the conclusion of our management that our internal control over financial reporting or disclosure controls and procedures are not effective. These events could cause investors to lose confidence in our reported financial information, adversely impact our stock price, result in increased costs to remediate any deficiencies, attract regulatory scrutiny or lawsuits that could be costly to resolve and distract management attention, limit our ability to access the capital markets or cause our stock to be delisted from The NASDAQ Global Market or any other securities exchange on which it is then listed. The price of our common stock may be volatile. The market price of our common stock is affected by a number of factors, including failure to maintain and increase production capacity and reduce per unit production costs; changes in the availability of third party reimbursement in the United States or other countries; volume and timing of orders for the Omnipod System; developments in administrative proceedings or litigation related to intellectual property rights; issuance of patents to us or our competitors; the announcement of new products or product enhancements by us or our competitors; the announcement of technological or medical innovations in the treatment or diagnosis of diabetes; changes in governmental regulations or in the status of our regulatory approvals or applications; developments in our industry; publication of clinical studies relating to the Omnipod System or a competitor product; quarterly variations in our or our competitors results of operations; changes in earnings estimates or recommendations by securities analysts; and general market conditions and other factors, including factors unrelated to our operating performance or the operating performance of our competitors. At times, the fluctuations in the market price of our common stock have been unrelated or disproportionate to our operating performance. In particular, the U.S. equity markets have at times experienced significant price and volume fluctuations that have affected the market prices of equity securities of many technology companies. Broad market and industry factors such as these could materially and adversely affect the market price of our stock, regardless of our actual operating performance. Conversion of any of our Convertible Senior Notes may dilute the ownership interest of existing stockholders or depress our stock price. The conversion of some or all of our Convertible Senior Notes may dilute the ownership interests of existing stockholders. Any sales in the public market of any of our common stock issuable upon such conversion could adversely affect prevailing market prices of our common stock. In addition, the anticipated conversion of the Convertible Senior Notes into a combination of cash and shares of our common stock could depress the price of our common stock. 37 Table of Contents Furthermore, the price of our common stock also could be affected by possible sales of our common stock by investors who view the Convertible Senior Notes as a more attractive means of equity participation in us and by hedging or arbitrage trading activity that we expect will develop involving our common stock. A decline in the price of shares of our common stock might impede our ability to raise capital through the issuance of additional shares of our common stock or other equity securities. We could be subject to indemnification obligations in connection with the disposition of our former Neighborhood Diabetes supplies business. In February 2016, we sold Neighborhood Diabetes to Liberty Medical. Under the terms of the sale, we agreed to indemnify Liberty Medical for certain customary matters primarily related to our pre closing operation of the business. Although we currently do not expect any material indemnification obligations to arise, we could be required to reimburse Liberty Medical for such claims in the event that they were to arise. Our ability to use net operating loss carryforwards may be subject to limitation. Section 382 of the U.S. Internal Revenue Code of 1986, as amended, imposes an annual limit on the amount of net operating loss carryforwards that may be used to offset taxable income when a corporation has underg1 significant changes in its stock ownership or equity structure. Our ability to use net operating losses may be limited by prior changes in our ownership, and may be further limited by the issuance of common stock in connection with the conversion of our Convertible Senior Notes, or by the consummation of other transactions. As a result, if we earn net taxable income, our ability to use net operating loss carryforwards to offset U.S. federal taxable income may become subject to limitations, which could potentially result in increased future tax liabilities for us. Anti takeover provisions in our organizational documents, our shareholder rights plan and Delaware law may discourage or prevent a change of control, even if an acquisition would be beneficial to our stockholders, which could affect our stock price adversely and prevent attempts by our stockholders to replace or remove our current management. Our certificate of incorporation and bylaws contain provisions that could delay or prevent a change of control of our company or changes in our board of directors that our stockholders might consider favorable. Some of these provisions authorize the issuance of preferred stock which can be created and issued by the board of directors without prior stockholder approval, with rights senior to those of our common stock; provide for a classified board of directors, with each director serving a staggered 3 year term; prohibit our stockholders from filling board vacancies, calling special stockholder meetings or taking action by written consent; provide for the removal of a director only with cause and by the affirmative vote of the holders of 75% or more of the shares then entitled to vote at an election of our directors; and require advance written notice of stockholder proposals and director nominations. We are subject to the provisions of Section 203 of the Delaware General Corporation Law, which may prohibit certain business combinations with stockholders owning 15% or more of our outstanding voting stock. These and other provisions in our certificate of incorporation, bylaws and Delaware law could make it more difficult for stockholders or potential acquirers to obtain control of our board of directors or initiate actions that are opposed by our then current board of directors, including a merger, tender offer or proxy contest involving our company. Any delay or prevention of a change of control transaction or changes in our board of directors could cause the market price of our common stock to decline. In addition, in November 2008, our board of directors adopted a shareholder rights plan, implementing what is commonly known as a poison pill. This poison pill significantly increases the costs that would be incurred by an unwanted third party acquirer if such party owns or announces its intent to commence a tender offer for more than 15% of our outstanding common stock or otherwise triggers the poison pill by exceeding the applicable stock ownership threshold. The existence of this poison pill could delay, deter or prevent a takeover of us. The shareholder rights plan is scheduled to expire in November 2018. 38 Table of Contents Item 1B. Unresolved Staff Comments N1 Item 2 Properties
